S.  HRG.  109–446

WEATHER  MODIFICATION  AND  S.  517,  THE 
WEATHER  MODIFICATION  RESEARCH  AND 
TECHNOLOGY  TRANSFER  AUTHORIZATION  ACT 
OF  2005

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEES ON: SCIENCE AND SPACE; 
DISASTER PREVENTION AND PREDICTION

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

NOVEMBER  10,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

28–211 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  SPACE 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

BILL  NELSON,  Florida,  Ranking 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  DISASTER  PREVENTION  AND  PREDICTION 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska,  Ranking 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on November 10, 2005 ......................................................................
Statement of Senator DeMint .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison ............................................................................

WITNESSES 

DeFelice, Dr. Thomas P., Past President, Weather Modification Association ....
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Garstang, Michael, Ph.D., Professor, University of Virginia; Chair, Committee 
on  Critical  Issues  in  Weather  Modification  Research,  National  Research 
Council of the National Academies .....................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Golden,  Dr.  Joseph  H.,  Senior  Research  Scientist,  Cooperative  Institute  for 
Research in the Environmental Sciences (CIRES), University of Colorado ....
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Marburger,  III,  John  H.,  Director,  Executive  Office  of  the  President,  Office 
of  Science  and  Technology  Policy,  letter,  dated  December  13,  2005  to  Hon. 
Kay Bailey Hutchison ..........................................................................................
Nelson, Hon. E. Benjamin, U.S. Senator from Nebraska, prepared statement ..
Response to written questions submitted to Dr. Thomas P. DeFelice by: 

Hon. Daniel K. Inouye ......................................................................................
Hon. E. Benjamin Nelson ................................................................................
Hon. Bill Nelson ...............................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  to  Michael  Garstang,  Ph.D.,  by: 
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye ......................................................................................
Hon. E. Benjamin Nelson ................................................................................
Hon. Bill Nelson ...............................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to Dr. Joseph H. Golden by: 

Hon. Daniel K. Inouye ......................................................................................
Hon. E. Benjamin Nelson ................................................................................
Hon. Bill Nelson ...............................................................................................
Wilhite, Dr. Donald, Director, National Drought Mitigation Center, University 
of Nebraska-Lincoln, prepared statement ..........................................................

Page 
1
1
18

7
8

10
12

3
5

29
27

33
33
34

35
35
35

30
31
32

27

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

WEATHER  MODIFICATION  AND  S.  517,  THE 
WEATHER  MODIFICATION  RESEARCH  AND 
TECHNOLOGY  TRANSFER  AUTHORIZATION 
ACT  OF  2005

THURSDAY,  NOVEMBER  10,  2005

SUBCOMMITTEES ON: SCIENCE AND SPACE; DISASTER 
PREVENTION AND PREDICTION, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittees met, pursuant to notice, at 2:30 p.m. in room 
SD–562,  Dirksen  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Jim  DeMint,
presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JIM DEMINT,

U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH CAROLINA 

Senator  DEMINT.  Good  afternoon.  Sorry  for  the  confusion.  I  ap-
preciate  all  of  you  folks  joining  us  this  afternoon  and  look  forward 
to  hearing  from  you.  My  other  chairman  of  this  meeting,  Senator 
Hutchison,  will  be  back  in  just  a  moment.  And  I  know  she’s  been 
a part of inviting this group here today. 

I  am  very  interested  in  the  testimony.  We  saw,  numerous  times 
this summer, and just this past weekend, in Indiana and Kentucky, 
that weather has a profound impact on the lives of Americans. And 
this afternoon, the Subcommittees will be discussing weather modi-
fication,  and,  specifically,  legislation  introduced  by  my  colleague, 
Senator  Hutchison,  Senate  bill  517,  the  Weather  Modification  Re-
search and Technology Transfer Authorization Act. 

As  I  understand,  the  genesis  of  this  legislation  was  to  help  pro-
vide  relief  to  drought-stricken  farmers  in  West  Texas  and  across 
the Nation. As we are all aware, weather modification technologies 
have been pursued for a number of years. For decades, the Federal 
Government  has  dedicated  significant  resources  to  weather  modi-
fication  research,  and  State  and  local  governments  continue  to 
spend  millions  on  both  operational  weather  modification  tech-
nologies and weather modification research. 

I  was  interested  to  learn  that  recently  the  National  Research 
Council  of  the  National  Academies,  the  Nation’s  leading  scientific 
body,  raised  some  concerns  about  efficacy  of  weather  modification 
research.  Because  of  the  importance  of  this  issue,  I’m  looking  for-
ward  to  Dr.  Garstang’s  comments  this  afternoon  and  his  assess-
ment  of  the  state  of  the  science  surrounding  weather  modification 
research.  It’s  entirely  possible  that,  at  some  point  in  the  future, 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

2

weather modification technologies might be viable. I continue to be 
impressed by the progress of all kinds of American innovations. At 
some point, this Committee may get to the point where it is consid-
ering  the  complex  legal,  social,  and  political  issues  surrounding 
whether  or  not  the  Nation  should  support  a  regimen  of  weather 
modification. But I am aware there are serious concerns about pur-
suing  a  regimen  of  intentional  weather  modification  and  want  to 
give those concerns careful consideration. 

I’m  also  concerned  that,  as  a  Nation,  we  do  not  have  sufficient 
understanding  of  how  our  atmosphere  behaves.  It  seems  that  this 
may be a concern shared by the Academy, noting some of the find-
ings  in  their  recent  report.  I  think  this  Committee  should  give 
thoughtful consideration to their principal conclusion, which stated 
that,  ‘‘Atmospheric  science  is  now  in  a  position  to  mount  a  con-
certed and sustained effort to delineate the scope and expectations 
of future weather modification research. Such an effort must be di-
rected at answering fundamental scientific questions that will yield 
results that will go well beyond application to intentional modifica-
tion.  The  emphasis  must  be  on  understanding  processes,  and  not 
on  modification.’’  I  think—in  other  words,  I  believe  what  I’m  hear-
ing them saying is that we need to understand how weather works 
now before we go too far in trying to modify it. 

I would also encourage the scientific community, and particularly 
the  atmospheric-sciences  community,  through  the  National  Acad-
emies or our scientific societies, to decide what are the highest pri-
orities  and  most  promising  areas  of  research  for  fundamental  at-
mospheric  research.  The  NRC  report  on  weather  modification  re-
search  outlines  some  areas  that  may  inform  weather  modification, 
such  as  precipitation  physics  and  cloud  modeling.  Could  these 
areas or other areas of the research be considered as part of a com-
prehensive  program  of  atmospheric  research?  I’ll  let  you  answer 
the question today. 

Priority-setting is going to be important. In recent years, Repub-
licans  in  Washington  have  endeavored  to  constrain  Federal  spend-
ing.  We’ve  not  been  as  successful  as  I  would  like,  but  I’m  com-
mitted  to  working  with  my  colleagues  to  ensure  that  Federal  dis-
cretionary spending not only does not grow, but that it shrinks. 

I say all this to encourage the atmospheric-science community to 
think  critically  about  where  you  want  to  put  the  next  dollar  in  at-
mospheric  research.  There  are  some  very  promising  places  to  put 
this  funding  that  could  have  a  dramatic  impact  on  the  lives  of  all 
Americans. I would encourage you to consider the various research 
initiatives proposed by the Academy in light of the other important 
initiatives that need to be undertaken to improve prediction of tor-
nado  formation,  to  understand  the  rapid  intensification  of  hurri-
canes, and the other challenges facing us. 

How do all of these competing priorities interact? Maybe there is 
some  overlap  that  will  address  these  important  issues  and  inform 
weather  modification.  I  hope  the  scientific  community  can  help  me 
and this Committee with this priority-setting. 

This Committee is committed to advancing atmospheric sciences, 
because  we  understand  what  an  important  role  weather  plays  in 
the lives of all Americans. So, I’m looking forward to hearing from 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

3

you.  This  issue  leaves  me  with  a  lot  of  questions,  and  I’m  hoping 
my witnesses can answer some of those questions today. 

Appearing this afternoon is Dr. Joe Golden, Senior Research Sci-
entist at Colorado’s Cooperative Institute for Research in the Envi-
ronmental Sciences. Dr. Golden previously directed NOAA’s weath-
er  modification  research  programs.  He  will  discuss  Senate  bill  517 
and its potential benefits for weather modification. 

Also with us is Dr. Tom DeFelice, past President of the National 
Weather  Modification  Association.  He  will  be  providing  perspec-
tives on the importance of weather modification and weather modi-
fication research. 

Finally,  appearing  before  the  Subcommittees  this  afternoon,  is 
Dr.  Michael  Garstang.  Dr.  Garstang  is  a  Distinguished  Emeritus 
Research  Professor  in  the  Department  of  Environmental  Sciences, 
at  the  University  of  Virginia.  He’s  a  fellow  at  the  American  Mete-
orological  Society,  the  AMS—and  has  served  on  numerous  AMS 
committees.  He  was  also  the  Chair  of  the  2003  National  Research 
Council  Committee  on  Critical  Issues  in  Weather  Modification  Re-
search. 

OK, having introduced all of our panelists, Dr. Golden, we’ll start 
with you, and if Senator Hutchison comes in, we may need to take 
a  break  and  let  her  make  a  statement  if  she  can’t  stay  the  whole 
time. 

So, Dr. Golden, please—I think we’re going to try to keep this to 

five minutes, and then some questions. 

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  JOSEPH  H.  GOLDEN,  SENIOR  RESEARCH 
SCIENTIST,  COOPERATIVE  INSTITUTE  FOR  RESEARCH  IN 
THE  ENVIRONMENTAL  SCIENCES  (CIRES),  UNIVERSITY  OF 
COLORADO 
Dr. GOLDEN. Thank you, Senator DeMint. 
I am honored to appear before you today in regards to Senate bill 
517,  the  Weather  Modification  Research  and  Technology  Transfer 
Authorization  Act  of  2005.  My  name  is  Dr.  Joseph  Golden,  retired 
from  NOAA  on  September  2,  2005,  after  over  41  years  of  Federal 
service  in  NOAA,  both  in  severe-weather  research  and  NWS  oper-
ations. I now work part-time as a Senior Research Scientist in the 
University  of  Colorado’s  Cooperative  Institute,  in  Boulder,  Colo-
rado. 

My  background  in  weather  modification  research  relates  to  the 
fact  that  I  was  the  last  NOAA  manager  of  the  Atmospheric  Modi-
fication  Program,  or  AMP,  in  NOAA  research  until  its  termination 
by the Congress in 1995. None of the NOAA AMP funds were used 
to  conduct  any  operational  cloud-seeding,  and  I  feel  that,  at  this 
time, funding under Senate bill 517 should also not be used to con-
duct any operational cloud-seeding. 

The Texas participation in my AMP program was the first to uti-
lize the NWS NEXRAD Doppler radar data to estimate the rainfall 
increases from seeding convective clouds in Texas. However, one of 
my  greatest  career  frustrations  has  been  witnessing  the  adoption 
of  new  research  results  and  technologies,  that  we  developed  under 
AMP,  by  other  countries,  while  our  Federal  research  and  tech-
nology transfer in my country has largely stagnated. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

4

One  example,  a  chemical  tracer  technique  that  we  developed  in 
my Nevada AMP program to quantify the amount of snow increase 
due  to  seeding  over  mountains  is  now  being  used  by  a  new  cloud-
seeding program in Australia. 

In  China  alone,  their  government  is  now  funding  a  greatly  ex-
panded  weather  modification  research  and  operations  program  at 
$100  million  per  year,  as  well  as  training  over  1,500  new  weather 
modification scientists. 

Federal  funding  for  weather  modification  research  in  the  United 
States  reached  its  pinnacle  in  the  1970s  and  early  1980s,  and  has 
steadily  declined  ever  since.  During  its  heyday,  weather  modifica-
tion  research  in  the  U.S.  was  at  the  cutting  edge  of  worldwide  ef-
forts.  For  example,  NOAA  conducted  large-scale  seeding  experi-
ments,  in  South  Florida,  called  FACE,  and  we  collaborated  with 
the  Navy  and  university  scientists  in  Project  STORMFURY  to 
weaken  hurricanes.  I  participated  in  STORMFURY  while  I  was  a 
Ph.D. candidate, and found it to be one of the most exhilarating ex-
periences of my career. 

The  need  for  a  renewed  national  commitment  and  funding  for 
weather  modification  research  has  become  more  urgent,  in  my 
view.  In  recent  years,  we  have  seen  severe  drought  in  my  home 
State  of  Colorado  and  the  Pacific  Northwest.  New  research  results 
show  unmistakable  impacts  of  air  pollution  in  reducing  seasonal 
precipitation  over  mountainous  areas  of  the  Western  U.S.  during 
the  past  several  decades.  Pollution  is  systematically  robbing  the 
western  mountains  of  winter  snowpack,  and,  if  the  process  con-
tinues,  will  lead  to  major  losses  of  runoff  water  for  hydroelectric 
power and agricultural crop productivity. However, research results 
in Israel—has demonstrated that their long-term cloud-seeding pro-
grams  have  offset  similar  pollution-induced  rainfall  losses  in  their 
country. 

Another weather modification research issue, and one that elicits 
scientific  controversy,  is  severe-storms  modification.  I  don’t  have 
time  to  go  into  this  in  any  depth,  but  one  of  the  longest-running 
hail-suppression  programs  in  the  world  is  in  North  Dakota.  And, 
during  my  tenure,  AMP  sponsored  their  research.  Positive  results 
on the impact of cloud-seeding to reduce hail damage to crops using 
insurance companies’ records of crop-loss ratios were so impressive 
in  North  Dakota,  that  the  Canadian  insurance  industry  has  sup-
ported  a  new  multi-year  effort  in  the  Province  of  Alberta,  Canada, 
to  protect  its  largest  cities  from  hail.  The  Alberta  hail-suppression 
program  uses  many  of  the  techniques  that  we  used  in  the  AMP 
North Dakota program. 

Finally,  after  the  horrendous  devastation  and  loss  of  life  from 
Hurricanes  Katrina  and  Rita,  I  have  been  asked  several  times 
about the possibility of hurricane modification. And, while we don’t 
have time to fully address the issue today, I firmly believe that we 
are in a much better position, both with the science and the under-
girding  technology,  than  we  were  when  Project  STORMFURY  was 
terminated  by  our  government  in  1982.  We  now  understand  that 
both  tornados  and  hurricanes  exhibit  a  life  cycle,  and  both  exhibit 
natural instabilities during their lifetimes. 

Even  after  the  demise  of  the  AMP  program  in  1995,  operational 
weather  modification  programs  have  continued  to  expand  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

5

flourish  in  the  U.S.  This  is  reflected  in  the  annual  reports  of  all 
such projects to NOAA, as required by law. 

I  like  the  idea  of  establishing  a  Weather  Modification  Advisory 
Board  with  broad  representation,  which  is  needed  to  set  the  na-
tional  agenda  and  priorities,  as  Senator  DeMint  has  already 
touched upon, for these and other urgent water-management issues 
facing the country. I have many close scientific colleagues in NOAA 
weather research who would welcome the opportunity to contribute 
to  a  reinvigorated  national  program  of  weather  modification  re-
search and technology transfer. 

In closing, I want to assure you that the U.S. has the technology 
and  the  best  and  brightest  scientists,  who  would  welcome  the  op-
portunity  to  reinvigorate  the  weather  modification  field.  These  are 
very  challenging  issues,  and  the  worsening  water  crises  in  the 
West and elsewhere demand our urgent attention. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Golden follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR.  JOSEPH H.  GOLDEN,  SENIOR RESEARCH SCIENTIST,
COOPERATIVE INSTITUTE FOR RESEARCH IN THE ENVIRONMENTAL SCIENCES 
(CIRES), UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO 
I am honored to appear before you today in regards to S. 517, the Weather Modi-
fication  Research  and  Technology  Transfer  Authorization  Act  of  2005.  My  name  is 
Dr.  Joseph  H.  Golden,  retired  from  NOAA  on  September  2,  2005  after  41.5  years 
of  Federal  service  in  NOAA,  both  in  severe  weather  research  and  NWS  operations. 
I now work part-time as a Senior Research Scientist in the University of Colorado’s 
Cooperative  Institute  for  Research  in  the  Environmental  Sciences  (CIRES)  in  Boul-
der,  Colorado.  My  background  in  weather  modification  research  relates  to  the  fact 
that I was the last NOAA manager of the Atmospheric Modification Program (AMP) 
in  NOAA  Research,  until  its  termination  by  the  Congress  in  1995.  I  was  never 
asked  by  anyone  to  defend  the  AMP  Program,  based  on  its  merits  and  accomplish-
ments.  The  AMP  program  was  written  into  NOAA’s  budget  by  the  Congress  for 
many years, beginning in the late 1970s. I view the AMP program and its research 
productivity as a highlight of my NOAA career, especially due to the cooperative ef-
forts among the six States in the program (Illinois, North Dakota, Texas, Utah, Ne-
vada  and  Arizona),  the  universities,  private-sector  operators,  and  NOAA  research. 
None of the NOAA AMP funds were used to conduct any operational cloud seeding, 
and I feel that, at this time, funding under S. 517 should also not be used for oper-
ational  cloud  seeding  efforts.  I  am  pleased  to  see  my  colleague,  George  Bomar  here 
from Texas: he was one of the State program managers in AMP, and his State was 
the  first  to  utilize  NWS  NEXRAD  Doppler  radar  data  to  estimate  the  rainfall  in-
creases  from  seeding  convective  clouds.  One  of  my  greatest  career  frustrations  has 
been witnessing the adoption of new research results and technologies we developed 
under  AMP  by  other  countries,  while  Federal  research  and  technology  transfer  in 
my own country has largely stagnated. For example, a chemical tracer technique de-
veloped  by  the  Nevada-AMP  program  to  quantify  the  amount  of  snow  increase  due 
to  seeding  over  mountains  is  now  being  used  by  a  new  cloud  seeding  program  in 
Australia.  In  China  alone,  their  government  is  funding  a  greatly-expanded  weather 
modification  research  and  operations  program  at  $100  million  per  year,  as  well  as 
training over 1,500 new weather modification scientists. 

In the limited time I speak before you today, I want to address two types of nat-
ural disasters, and the potential for planned weather modification to alleviate them: 
slow-onset  disasters  over  many  years,  such  as  the  continuing  drought  in  the  West, 
and the quick-onset disasters such as the record-breaking Atlantic hurricane season 
this year and the massive Oklahoma City tornado outbreak of May 1999. 

Federal funding for weather modification research in the U.S. reached its pinnacle 
in  the  1970s  and  early  1980s,  and  has  steadily  declined  ever  since.  During  its  hey-
day, weather modification research in the U.S. was at the cutting edge of worldwide 
efforts.  For  example,  NOAA  conducted  large-scale  seeding  experiments  in  South 
Florida  (called  FACE)  and  collaborated  with  the  Navy  and  university  scientists  in 
Project  STORMFURY,  to  weaken  hurricanes.  I  participated  in  STORMFURY  while 
a Ph.D candidate, and found it to be one of most exhilarating experiences of my ca-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

6

reer. The National Center for Atmospheric Research (NCAR) also organized the Na-
tional  Hail  Research  Experiment,  which  attempted  to  test  the  validity  of  the  Rus-
sian  approach  to  artificially  reduce  hail  by  cloud  seeding.  Finally,  the  Bureau  of 
Reclamation  carried  out  the  High  Plains  experiment,  to  seed  convective  clouds  for 
rainfall  increases  over  the  Central  U.S.  While  each  of  these  programs,  in  my  opin-
ion,  produced  outstanding  scientific  results  and  new  operational  insights,  they  pro-
duced  results  that  were  inconclusive  insofar  as  statistical  evaluation  is  concerned. 
Nevertheless, I feel that our community was a good steward and used limited fund-
ing very wisely. I am also convinced that the atmospheric sciences have come a long 
way  during  the  intervening  years.  The  scientific  foundation  and  underlying  physics 
in  purposeful  weather  modification,  i.e.,  cloud  seeding,  is  sound  and  well-estab-
lished.  We  now  have  both  the  science  and  the  technology  to  launch  a  new  research 
attack on some of these other vexing problems. 

The  need  for  a  renewed  national  commitment  and  funding  for  weather  modifica-
tion research has become more urgent. In recent years, we have seen severe drought 
in my home State of Colorado and the Pacific Northwest. New research results show 
unmistakable impacts of air pollution in reducing seasonal precipitation over moun-
tainous areas of the Western U.S. during the past several decades. Pollution is sys-
tematically  robbing  the  Western  mountains  of  winter  snowpack,  and  if  the  process 
continues, will lead to major losses of runoff water for hydroelectric power and agri-
cultural  crop  productivity.  However,  research  in  Israel  has  demonstrated  that  their 
long-term  cloud  seeding  programs  have  offset  similar  pollution-induced  rainfall 
losses  in  their  country.  The  new  research  has  also  developed  new  analysis  tech-
niques  with  NOAA  satellite  data  to  objectively  identify  and  separate  pollution  epi-
sodes from affected neighboring clouds. The pollution effects on natural precipitation 
in  our  country  and  elsewhere  is  certainly  a  critical  research  issue  for  this  bill.  An-
other  issue  needing  more  research  attention  is  the  question  of  extra-area  effects:  if 
we  seed  cloud  systems  in  one  area,  and  successfully  produce  increases  of  precipita-
tion  there,  are  we  ‘‘robbing  Peter  to  pay  Paul’’  in  downwind  locations?  Results  sup-
ported by AMP suggested the answer is no, and that there is either no effect down-
wind, or a slight increase in precipitation. 

Another weather modification research issue, and one that always elicits scientific 
controversy,  is  severe  storms  modification.  This  issue  was  not  addressed  much  in 
the  NAS/NRC  weather  modification  report  chaired  by  my  distinguished  colleague, 
Michael Garstang. These are the quick-onset disasters of which I spoke earlier, and 
include  hailstorms,  tornadoes  and  hurricanes  like  Katrina  and  Rita  this  year.  I 
should emphasize that AMP supported some outstanding hail modification research 
with  the  North  Dakota  Cloud  Modification  Program.  This  operational  program  is 
one  of  the  longest-running  hail  suppression  programs  in  the  world.  Positive  results 
on the impact of cloud-seeding to reduce hail damage to crops, using insurance com-
panies’ records of crop-loss ratios, were so impressive, that the Canadian insurance 
industry  has  supported  a  new  multi-year  effort  in  the  province  of  Alberta,  Canada 
to  protect  its  largest  cities  from  hail.  The  Alberta  hail-suppression  program  uses 
many of the techniques that we used in the AMP-North Dakota program. 

After  the  horrendous  devastation  and  loss  of  life  from  Hurricanes  Katrina  and 
Rita,  I  have  been  asked  several  times  about  the  possibilility  of  hurricane  modifica-
tion.  And  while  I  don’t  have  the  time  to  fully  address  this  issue  today,  I  firmly  be-
lieve  that  we  are  in  a  much  better  position,  both  with  the  science  and  the  under-
girding  technology,  than  we  were  when  Project  STORMFURY  was  terminated  in 
1982.  We  now  understand  that  both  tornadoes  and  hurricanes  exhibit  a  life-cycle, 
and  both  exhibit  natural  instabilities  during  their  lifetimes.  The  key  atmospheric 
condition leading to the decay of both destructive vortices is cooler, drier air, as well 
as  cooling  sea  surface  conditions  for  decaying  hurricanes.  Recent  observational  and 
modeling studies both suggest that there may be new approaches possible for future 
weakening  or  track-diversion  of  hurricanes  threatening  our  shoreline.  The  key  un-
certainty,  and  one  which  requires  enhanced  observations,  is  more  continuous  and 
accurate monitoring of the natural fluctuations in hurricane intensity and path. For 
example,  Wilma  intensified  in  the  western  Caribbean  overnight  from  a  Category  1 
to  a  Category  5  hurricane,  resulting  in  the  lowest  pressure  ever  measured  in  the 
eye of an Atlantic-basin hurricane. There are now some very exciting computer mod-
els  that  reproduce  both  hurricane  intensification  and  tornado  behavior  in  remark-
able detail. If we mount a sustained, adequately-funded national program of weath-
er  modification  research  and  technology  transfer,  I  believe  that  it  may  also  be  pos-
sible  to  successfully  weaken  tornadoes  (or,  alternatively,  shorten  their  life-cycles).  I 
would  be  pleased  to  elaborate  details  on  promising  approaches  and  testable 
hypotheses  for  tornado/hurricane  amelioration  at  some  future  time.  I  am  presently 
collaborating  with  colleagues,  Drs.  Rosenfeld  and  Woodley,  in  testing  a  new  tech-
nique  for  identifying  storm  systems  with  high  threat  of  producing  tornadoes.  This 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

7

technique  utilizes  NOAA  satellite  data  at  various  wavelengths  and  shows  promise 
in improving NWS lead-times for tornado watches and warnings. 

Even after the demise of the AMP Program in 1995, operational weather modifica-
tion  programs  have  continued  to  expand  and  flourish  in  the  U.S.  This  is  reflected 
in  the  annual  reports  of  all  such  projects  to  NOAA,  as  required  by  law.  Most  of 
these projects are supported by the States, utilities or the private-sector. One of my 
private-sector colleagues recently noted his estimate of total annual expenditures in 
the  U.S.  of  $25–30  million  for  weather  modification  operational  projects.  There  is 
now  very  little  Federally-supporting  research  to  aid  these  operational  programs  in 
evaluation, or improving their technological base. We have some of the best cutting-
edge  science  in  NOAA  research,  NCAR  and  the  universities  that  can  help  the  pri-
vate  weather  modification  operators  improve  their  evaluation  of  seeding  effects,  as 
well as improved targeting of seeding materials in suitable cloud systems. I like the 
idea of establishing the Weather Modification Advisory Board, with broad represen-
tation, which is needed to set the national agenda and priorities for these and other 
urgent  water  management  issues  facing  the  country.  I  have  many  close  scientific 
colleagues  in  NOAA  weather  research  who  would  welcome  the  opportunity  to  con-
tribute  to  a  reinvigorated  national  program  of  weather  modification  research  and 
technology  transfer,  if  support  can  be  found.  In  fact,  our  Boulder  laboratories  won 
a  Department  of  Commerce  Gold  Medal  for  our  contributions  to  the  recently-com-
pleted  NWS  Modernization  and  AWIPS  computer  workstations.  I  am  one  who  has 
long  believed,  that  to  be  successful  in  any  form  of  purposeful  weather  modification, 
we must first do a very good job of predicting the natural phenomena. 

In  closing,  I  want  to  assure  you  that  the  U.S.  has  the  technology  and  the  best 
and  brightest  scientists  who  would  welcome  the  opportunity  to  reinvigorate  the 
weather  modification  field.  These  are  very  challenging  issues  and  the  worsening 
water crises in the West and elsewhere demand our urgent attention.

Senator DEMINT. Thank you. 
Dr. Defelice? 
STATEMENT OF DR. THOMAS P. DEFELICE, PAST PRESIDENT, 

WEATHER MODIFICATION ASSOCIATION 

Dr.  DEFELICE.  I  am  honored  to  appear  here  today  in  regards  to 

Senate bill 517. 

My name is Dr. Tom DeFelice. I have two degrees in atmospheric 
science,  bachelor’s  in—and  Ph.D.,  and  a  master’s  in  atmospheric 
physics. 

I was the WMA President—‘‘WMA’’ stands for the Weather Modi-
fication Association—President for 2 years, between 2000 and 2002. 
I’m  now  the  Chair  of  the  WMA  Public  Information  and  Outreach 
Committee. I began the process before you today by engaging a re-
tired  State  Senator  from  Texas,  John  Leedom,  who  then  engaged 
Senator Hutchison and her staff. 

My  experiences  and  the  literature  demonstrate  that  weather 
modification  technologies  generally  possess  the  potential  to  in-
crease  the  rainfall  when  applied  under  appropriate  conditions.  I 
don’t  have  time  to  go  into  all  the  details  of  those  conditions,  but 
will gladly take some questions later. 

The  scientific  and  operational  communities  generally  agree  that 
the recent advances in the relevant general physical processes and 
technologies used to assess those processes come together and form 
the  basis  for  the  need  to  have  a  sustained  national  program  to 
carry  out  basic  and  applied  research  in  weather  modification 
sciences.  This  happens  to  be  one  of  the  main  recommendations  of 
the Garstang report. 

Basically,  I  see  Senate  bill  517  as  the  next  logical  step  as  one 
could derive from the Garstang report. It is about research and de-
velopment  of  technologies.  But  it’s  not  just  any  research  and  any 
development;  it  is  research  and  development  that  could  ultimately 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

8

be  used  to  produce  a  product  that  could  help  everybody.  It  could 
help  commerce,  improve  better  forecasts  of  the  weather,  which 
could then help our agricultural entities better plan their crops, for 
example.  It  could  help  science  by  improving  their  models,  improv-
ing  our  understanding  of  processes,  especially  those  of  hurricanes, 
to understand why hurricanes like Katrina could form, for example. 
But  it  also  could  reinvigorate  education.  It  could  help  transpor-
tation by planning for certain weather events that we may or may 
not  be  able  to  detect,  or  take  for  granted—freezing  rain,  icing  of 
roads, for example. Predicting and mitigating adverse weather con-
ditions in these cases would have a great benefit, not only to lives, 
but also to our economies. It could also help airports in certain cir-
cumstances, particularly during the winter, by clearing out fogs. 

Technology could benefit, since the results, information from this 
bill  could  be  another  application  directing  its  innovators  and  be 
used  to  transfer  said  information  to  the  public.  So  the  research 
from  this  bill  could  also  help  the  people.  And  that’s  what  it’s  all 
about.  Because  the  people  are  faced  with  an  impending  water 
shortage.  By  the  decade  of  the  2020s,  our  models  predict  that  40 
percent of the world’s population are going to be living in drought-
stressed  areas.  And  we  need  to  start  doing  something  now  about 
that, because if we wait, it will be too late, because we haven’t been 
doing  the  research  to  develop  and  to  make  sure  we  have  all  our 
ducks  in  a  row,  all  our  technologies  up  to  par,  so  that  they  could 
be  of  some  more  use  (for  those  that  are  not  useful  already).  We 
need  to  do  something  about  this,  because  8  percent  of  the  total 
water  budget  on  the  globe  is  due  to  consumption,  and  only  1  per-
cent  of  the  water  budget  is  currently  an  input.  That’s  rain.  Now, 
with global warming—and the results of that are predicted to mini-
mize precipitation falling to the ground—that means by the decade 
of  the  2020s,  or  shortly  thereafter,  less  than  1  percent  of  the  total 
water budget is going to be an input. That means we’re—and with 
the  population  growing,  we’re  going  to  consume  more  water,  so 
we’re  going  to  have  a  really,  really  grave  and—how  do  I  say  it?—
big  problem  on  our  hands,  because,  well,  there  won’t  be  enough 
water to feed our crops. 

And  so,  I  strongly  urge  everybody—on  this  Committee  and  else-
where—to  consider  passing  this  bill  and  bringing  it  to  its  com-
panion bill in the House. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. DeFelice follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. THOMAS P. DEFELICE, PAST PRESIDENT, WEATHER 

MODIFICATION ASSOCIATION 

I am honored to appear before you today in regards to Senate bill 517, the Weath-
er  Modification  Research  and  Technology  Transfer  Authorization  Act  of  2005.  My 
name  is  Dr.  Thomas  P.  DeFelice.  My  background  in  weather  modification  began 
when  I  was  15  by  reading  books  on  the  subject;  I  had  many  sessions  with  WMA 
forefathers  Schaefer  &  Vonnegutt  as  an  undergrad;  my  academic  and  subsequent 
professional career concentrated on learning the fundamentals of weather modifica-
tion  relevant  sciences  and  its  technologies;  President  of  WMA  (2000–2002),  Chair 
WMA Public Information Committee (since 2004). I now work as the contractor pro-
gram  manager  for  two  NOAA  programs.  I  am  here  on  my  own  behalf,  expressing 
my  own  beliefs.  I  began  this  process,  engaged  John  Leedom,  who  engaged  Senator 
Hutchison & her staff, and here we are today. 

Weather  modification  technologies  are  key  to  dealing  with  many  present  and  po-
tential  future  scientific,  environmental,  and  socioeconomic  issues  like  steadily  in-
creasing  human  suffering  and  property  damage  caused  by  hazardous  weather  (e.g., 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

9

severe  weather-Katrina,  supercooled  fog,  freezing  rain),  fire,  and  other  environ-
mental  problems  related  to  ‘‘acid  rain,’’  biological  or  chemical  warfare,  for  instance. 
Their application generally increases rainfall amount. Rain contributes 1 percent of 
the total global water budget. Global water consumption presently makes up 8 per-
cent  of  the  total  global  water  budget.  Models  estimate  about  40  percent  of  the 
world’s population will live in water—stressed areas by the decade of the 2020s and 
consumption will increase. Further, air pollution (global warming) is reported to re-
duce the amount of rainfall. Hence, a need to develop new technologies, while apply-
ing proven techniques. Water rationing and water management techniques are use-
ful,  they  do  not  replenish  the  reduced  rainwater  amount.  (They  simply  put  a  small 
band-aid  on  a  wound  that  requires  multiple  stitches.)  Therefore  they  fail  to  resolve 
the  issues’  root  cause.  Alternatively,  weather  modification  technologies  increase  the 
rainfall  amount  (compared  to  normal)  under  certain  conditions.  (They  simply  put 
multiple  stitches  on  a  wound  that  requires  multiple  stitches.)  Therefore  weather 
modification  technologies  can  resolve  the  issues’  root  cause,  which  will  be  ensured 
through  the  research  and  development  program  set  up  by  passing  S.  517  and  its 
companion bill (H.R. 2995). 

Yet some retain an issue concerning whether operational cloud seeding activities, 
especially  associated  with  convective  clouds,  achieved  the  intended  results  claimed. 
Additional  evaluations  should  pacify  this  issue,  especially  with  the  recent  techno-
logical  advances.  This  would  also  help  us  answer,  are  weather  modification  tech-
nologies  ready  to  increase  water  resources  and  alleviate,  or  possibly  prevent 
drought. Yes, they are ready to increase water resources under certain cases, based 
on  the  available  60-year  literature  archive,  and  first-hand  information.  S.  517  pro-
vides  a  research  and  development  infrastructure  for  a  program  that  addresses  and 
ultimately  resolves  these  issues,  while  nurturing  and  developing  these  technologies 
to provide better returns on our investment. 

The  scientific  and  operational  communities  generally  agree  that  the  recent  ad-
vances  in  the  relevant,  general  physical  processes  and  technologies  need  to  be  cap-
italized  upon  in  the  form  of  a  concerted  and  sustained  national  program  to  carry 
out  basic  and  applied  research  in  weather  modification  (e.g.,  Garstang  report, 
Orville report, NRC). However, the perceptions between the science and operational 
communities  differ,  namely,  (1)  Interpretation  of  scientific  proof,  (2)  Current  status 
of cloud models as applied to weather modification, (3) Evidence of glaciogenic seed-
ing  in  convective  clouds,  (4)  Cold  season  orographic  seeding,  (5)  Evidence  for  hail 
suppression, and (6) Support for specific purposes. The cold season orographic seed-
ing  perceptual  difference  (4)  is  not  a  significant  difference  in  perspective,  since  the 
science  community  (post  Garstang  report)  sees  orographic  cloud  seeding  as  a  par-
ticularly promising candidate for an intensive field program. 

Perceptual  difference  (6)  reflects  the  differences  between  the  individual  cultures 
(i.e.,  scientific  versus  operational)  than  anything  else.  Nonetheless,  no  implementa-
tion plans have been proposed. 

I  summarize  an  implementation  plan  for  S.  517  for  consideration  by  its  Weather 
Modification  Board,  which  addresses  all  issues.  This  implementation  plan  is  born 
from sound scientific basis derived from 60 years of lessons learned exercises, recent 
technological  advances,  and  science  community  recommendations  (Garstang  report, 
Orville report, NRC). Societal need provides an impetus for developing systems and 
technologies  that  monitor  and  manage  atmospheric  events,  the  creation  of  a  new 
weather  modification  research  program  and  implementation  plan  according  to 
standard  engineering  practices.  This  plan  helps  mitigate  the  perceptual  diferences 
by  setting  up  an  integrated  team  approach  to  its  activities,  and  by  insisting  that 
its  research  and  development  component  be  geared  toward  improving  the  effective-
ness of operations. 

It calls for administering the resources and the activities for all research and de-
velopment  efforts  directed  toward  optimizing  the  technologies  used  to  manage  at-
mospheric  processes  and  their  resultants  (e.g.,  collision-coalescence,  hurricanes, 
orographic and convective precipitation, frozen rain). Its mission would be to develop 
the  technologies  used  for  operational  activities  that  help  provide  sustainable  water 
supplies  and  reduce  airborne  hazards.  This  includes  improving  the  understanding 
of  the  relevant  processes  and  their  simulations,  as  well  as  the  evaluation  methods 
(physical;  chemical;  statistical-random,  non-random)  for  operational  activities 
through  cooperative  multidisciplinary  research  and  development  arrangements  and 
a well-designed outreach effort. Further development is needed for successful appli-
cation of weather modification technologies to mitigate hurricane and tornado dam-
age, minimize the negative affects of anthropogenic air pollution on precipitation ef-
ficiency,  or  to  neutralize  negative  effects  from  pollutant  deposition.  Such  requires 
a modeling approach, then verification, and transition to operational use. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

10

The modern weather modification technologies applied to disperse supercooled fog, 
augment  the  ice  crystal  process  in  cloud  systems,  especially  orographic  clouds,  are 
very effective. Statistical reanalysis using 50+ years of Sierra data show strong sig-
nals  that  the  seeding  did  produce  seasonal  snowpack  increases  of  5–10  percent;  as 
measured  by  stream  runoff  data  (a  conservative  surrogate  for  snowpack  increases). 
Thus,  orographic  systems,  especially  winter  orographic  systems,  would  help  maxi-
mize  S.  517  derived  program  success.  Garstang’s  report  apparently  was  unclear  on 
this fact. 

The implementation plan does not include less developed technologies (e.g., extra-
terrestrial  mirrors;  ionization,  chaos  theory-related  approaches;  sonic  initiation  of 
precipitation,  making  a  hurricane  disappear  from  conventional  radar),  or  tech-
nologies that are already known to be too costly for the benefits they provide if any 
(e.g.,  using  vertical  pointing  jet  engines,  or  mono-layer  films  to  suppress  moisture 
flow  into  hurricanes),  based  on  insufficient  scientific  and  engineering  test  results, 
which  pose  a  significant  risk  to  programmatic  success.  The  plan  does  not  support 
funding  for  Federal  Operational  cloud  seeding,  except  for  small  tests/experiments  of 
new technologies.

In closing, failure to send S. 517 to appropriate committee hearings with the com-
panion  Udall  Bill  (H.R.  2995),  translates  into  desertification,  more  destructive 
weather, and even jeopardizes our standing as the premier scientists, engineers and 
practitioners  in  this  area.  We  have  an  implementation  plan  for  the  program  under 
this  bill.  We  have  the  best  technology,  the  brightest  personnel  to  successfully  carry 
out the implementation plan. The 60 years scientific and engineering basis helps as-
sure  success.  Passing  S.  517  now,  helps  avert  adverse  efects  of  desertification, 
Katrina-like  hurricane  destruction,  and  air  pollution  effect  on  the  rain  process,  for 
example.  Thus,  this  tax  payer  fully  supports  passage  of  Senate  bill  S.  517  with  a 
sufficient budget and duration.

Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Doctor. 
Dr. Garstang? 

STATEMENT  OF  MICHAEL  GARSTANG,  PH.D.,  PROFESSOR,
UNIVERSITY OF VIRGINIA; CHAIR, COMMITTEE ON CRITICAL 
ISSUES  IN  WEATHER  MODIFICATION  RESEARCH,  NATIONAL 
RESEARCH COUNCIL OF THE NATIONAL ACADEMIES 
Dr.  GARSTANG.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Hutchison  and  Senator 

DeMint. 

My  name  is  Michael  Garstang.  I  am  a  Distinguished  Emeritus 
Research  Professor  in  the  Department  of  Environmental  Sciences 
at the University of Virginia. I’m a fellow of the American Meteoro-
logical Society. And I was also Chair of the 2003 National Research 
Council’s Committee on Critical Issues in Weather Modification Re-
search. The National Research Council is the operating arm of the 
National  Academies,  chartered  by  Congress  in  1863  to  advise  the 
Government on matters of science and technology. 

This  afternoon,  I  will  give  you  a  brief  summary  of  the  status  of 
weather  modification  research  as  described  in  our  report.  You’ll  be 
provided with the executive summary of that report. 

Efforts  to  minimize  harmful  weather  effects  go  far  back  in  time. 
The first serious scientific efforts in the United States began in the 
1950s.  This  effort  was  not  sustained.  During  the  past  30  years, 
there  has  been  a  progressive  decline  in  weather  modification  re-
search.  Research  support  related  to  weather  modification  in  the 
United States has dropped to less than a half a million dollars per 
year in the year 1999, from a high of $20 million in the late 1970s. 
There  have  been,  concurrently,  significant  advances  in  tech-
nology  over  the  past  30  years.  This  has  greatly  improved  our  abil-
ity  to  observe,  understand,  and  predict  the  weather.  These  ad-
vances,  however,  have  not  been  either  collectively  or  persistently 
applied to the problem of weather modification. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

11

This  decline  in  research  must—may  be  the  result  of  a  combina-
tion  of  factors,  including  early  over-optimistic  claims,  unrealistic 
expectations,  and  a  failure  to  provide  scientifically  demonstrable 
successes. But, despite these limitations, and because of the consid-
erable  pressures  that  my  colleagues  have  already  indicated  result-
ing from drought, hail, floods, and storm damage, private and State 
agencies  spend  significant  resources  to  attempt  to  modify  the 
weather. 

In  2001,  there  were  66  operational  weather  modification  pro-
grams in ten States in the Union, and much more activity overseas. 
How  do  we  overcome  this  disparity  between  our  willingness  to  at-
tempt  to  modify  the  weather  and  our  reluctance  to  fund  research 
to understand such activities? 

The  NRC’s  committee  concluded  that,  first,  with  few  exceptions, 
there  is  still  no  convincing  scientific  proof  of  the  efficacy  of  inten-
tional weather modification. In some instances, encouraging results 
have  been  observed,  but  this  evidence  has  not  been  subjected  to 
adequate testing. 

Second,  that  despite  this  lack  of  proof,  scientific  understanding 
has  progressed  on  many  fronts.  For  instance,  there  has  been  sub-
stantial improvements in ice-nucleating capabilities of new seeding 
materials. Also, new technologies such as satellite imagery are giv-
ing us tools to better understand microphysical processes that lead 
to precipitation. Dr. Golden referred to this. These advantages will 
help us focus and optimize weather modification research. 

Third,  that  if  progress  in  establishing  our  capability  to  modify 
the  weather  is  to  be  made,  the  focus  must  be  on  key  uncertainties 
that  hamper  progress.  For  example,  there  are  critical  gaps  in  our 
understanding of the complex chain of physical processes that lead 
to rain, snow, and hail. 

The  NRC  committee’s  primary  recommendation  is  the  establish-
ment of a coordinated national program of weather modification re-
search  designed  to  reduce  these  and  other  key  uncertainties.  The 
program  should  consist  of  a  sustained  research  effort  that  uses  a 
balanced approach of modeling, laboratory studies, and field meas-
urements. Instead of focusing on near-term operational applications 
of  weather  modification,  the  program  should  address  fundamental 
questions.  It  should  take  full  advantage  of  recent  related  research 
and  advances  in  observational,  computational,  and  statistical  tech-
nologies. 

Our  Committee—in  our—in  the  Committee’s  opinion,  it  is  pre-
mature to initiate large operational weather modification programs. 
Instead,  great  opportunity  exists  to  coordinate  research  efforts  to 
address  fundamental  questions  that  will  lead  to  credible  scientific 
results.  Focused  investigation  of  atmospheric  processes  plus  cou-
pled  technological  applications  will  advance  understanding  and 
bring  many  unexpected  benefits.  This  research  will  place  us  in  a 
position  to  determine  whether,  how,  and  to  what  extent  weather 
systems can be modified. 

In  conclusion,  the  NRC  committee  emphasizes  that  weather 
modification  should  be  viewed  as  a  fundamental  and  legitimate 
part  of  the  atmospheric  and  environmental  science.  Growing  de-
mand  for  fresh  water,  increasing  levels  of  damage  and  loss  of  life 
resulting  from  severe  weather,  the  undertaking  of  operational  ac-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

12

tivities  without  the  guidance  of  a  sound  scientific  foundation,  and 
the reality of inadvertent atmospheric changes, the science commu-
nity now has the opportunity, the challenge, and the responsibility 
to  assess  the  potential  efficacy  and  value  of  intentional  weather 
modification. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify.  I  will  be  happy  to  an-

swer questions. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Garstang follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MICHAEL GARSTANG,  PH.D.,  PROFESSOR,  UNIVERSITY OF 
VIRGINIA;  CHAIR,  COMMITTEE ON CRITICAL ISSUES IN WEATHER MODIFICATION
RESEARCH, NATIONAL RESEARCH COUNCIL OF THE NATIONAL ACADEMIES 
Good  afternoon  Chairmen  Hutchison  and  DeMint,  Ranking  Members  Bill  Nelson 
and  Ben  Nelson,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittees.  My  name  is  Michael 
Garstang,  and  I  am  a  Distinguished  Emeritus  Research  Professor  in  the  Depart-
ment  of  Environmental  Sciences  at  the  University  of  Virginia.  I’m  a  fellow  of  the 
American Meteorological Society (AMS) and have served on numerous AMS commit-
tees. I was also the chair of the 2003 National Research Council’s (NRC) Committee 
on Critical Issues in Weather Modification Research. The National Research Council 
is  the  operating  arm  of  the  National  Academies,  chartered  by  Congress  in  1863  to 
advise the government on matters of science and technology. 

This afternoon I will give you a brief summary of the status of weather modifica-
tion  research,  as  described  in  our  NRC  report,  the  major  uncertainties  that  exist, 
and convey the Committee’s conclusions and recommendations. We will also provide 
an Executive Summary of the report which lists the key findings and recommenda-
tions in greater detail. 

Efforts  to  minimize  harmful  weather  impacts  go  back  far  in  time.  In  the  last  30 
years,  significant  evidence  has  accumulated  that  human  activities  unintentionally 
affect  the  weather  on  scales  ranging  from  local  to  global.  Many  of  the  same  funda-
mental principles underlie both intentional and unintentional weather modification. 
Yet during this 30-year time period, there has been a progressive decline in weather 
modification  research.  Research  support  related  to  weather  modification  in  the 
United States had dropped to less than $0.5M per year in 1999 from a high of $20M 
in  the  late  1970s.  During  the  same  period,  there  have  been  significant  advances  in 
technology.  This  has  greatly  improved  our  ability  to  observe,  understand,  and  pre-
dict the weather. These advances, however, have not been either collectively or per-
sistently applied to the problem of weather modification. 

This  decline  in  research  is  likely  the  result  of  a  combination  of  factors,  including 
early  overly-optimistic  claims,  unrealistic  expectations,  and  failure  to  provide  sci-
entifically  demonstrable  successes.  But  despite  these  limitations,  and  because  of 
considerable  pressures  resulting  from  drought,  hail,  floods,  and  storm  damage,  pri-
vate  and  state  agencies  actually  spend  significant  resources  on  attempts  to  modify 
the  weather.  In  2001,  there  were  66  operational  weather  modification  programs  in 
10 states and much more activity overseas. 

How  do  we  overcome  this  disparity  between  our  willingness  to  attempt  to  modify 
weather  and  our  reluctance  to  fund  research  to  understand  such  activities?  The 
2003  National  Academies  committee  that  I  chaired  was  charged  to  provide  an  up-
dated  assessment  of  the  current  state  and  the  future  of  weather  modification  re-
search,  from  new  technologies  to  advances  in  numerical  modeling  and  operations. 
A  summary  of  our  report  is  included  in  my  written  testimony.  In  my  comments,  I 
want to focus on our conclusions and recommendations. 

First,  with  a  few  exceptions,  the  Committee  concluded  that  there  still  is  no  con-
vincing scientific proof of the efficacy of intentional weather modification efforts. In 
some  instances  encouraging  results  have  been  observed,  but  this  evidence  has  not 
been subjected to adequate testing. 

Second,  despite  this  lack  of  proof,  the  Committee  concluded  that  scientific  under-
standing  has  progressed  on  many  fronts.  For  instance,  there  have  been  substantial 
improvements in the ice-nucleating capabilities of new seeding materials. Also, new 
technologies  such  as  satellite  imagery  are  giving  us  tools  to  better  understand  the 
microphysical  processes  that  lead  to  precipitation,  and  these  advances,  in  time  can 
help focus and optimize weather modification research. 

Third, the Committee stated that if progress in establishing our capability to mod-
ify the weather is to be made, intellectual and technical resources must be brought 
to bear on the key uncertainties that hamper progress. For example, there are crit-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

13

ical  gaps  in  our  understanding  of  the  complex  chain  of  physical  processes  that  lead 
to rain, snow, and hail. 

Finally,  and  most  importantly,  the  Committee  called  for  the  establishment  of  a 
coordinated  national  program  of  weather  modification  research  designed  to  reduce 
these  and  other  key  uncertainties.  The  program  should  consist  of  a  sustained  re-
search  effort  that  uses  a  balanced  approach  of  modeling,  laboratory  studies,  and 
field  measurements.  Instead  of  focusing  on  near-term  operational  applications  of 
weather  modification,  the  program  should  address  fundamental  research  questions. 
It  should  take  full  advantage  of  recent  related  research  and  advances  in  observa-
tional, computational, and statistical technologies, by:

• Capitalizing  on  new  remote  and  in  situ  observational  tools  to  carry  out  explor-

atory and confirmatory experiments in a variety of cloud and storm systems;

• Improving model treatment of cloud and precipitation physics;
• Improving the use of current computational and data assimilation methods; and
• Capitalizing  on  existing  field  facilities  and  developing  partnerships  among  re-

search groups and select operational programs.

In  the  Committee’s  opinion,  it  is  premature  to  initiate  large-scale  operational 
weather  modification  programs.  However,  a  great  opportunity  exists  to  coordinate 
research  efforts  to  address  the  fundamental  questions  that  will  lead  to  credible  sci-
entific results. Focused investigation of atmospheric processes, coupled with techno-
logical  applications,  will  advance  understanding  and  bring  many  unexpected  bene-
fits  and  results.  In  time,  this  research  will  place  us  in  a  position  to  determine 
whether,  how,  and  to  what  extent  weather  and  weather  systems  can  be  modified. 
Closing Thoughts 

The  NRC  Committee  emphasizes  that  weather  modification  should  be  viewed  as 
a  fundamental  and  legitimate  element  of  atmospheric  and  environmental  science. 
Owing  to  the  growing  demand  for  fresh  water,  the  increasing  levels  of  damage  and 
loss  of  life  resulting  from  severe  weather,  the  undertaking  of  operational  activities 
without the guidance of a careful scientific foundation, and the reality of inadvertent 
atmospheric  changes,  the  scientific  community  now  has  the  opportunity,  challenge, 
and  responsibility  to  assess  the  potential  efficacy  and  value  of  intentional  weather 
modification technologies. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  ques-

tions the Subcommittees might have. 

EXECUTIVE SUMMARY 

The  weather  on  planet  Earth  is  a  vital  and  sometimes  fatal  force  in  human  af-
fairs.  Efforts  to  control  or  reduce  the  harmful  impacts  of  weather  go  back  far  in 
time. In recent decades our ability to observe and predict various types of meteoro-
logical  systems  has  increased  tremendously.  Yet  during  this  same  period  there  has 
been  a  progressive  decline  in  weather  modification  research.  Extravagant  claims, 
unrealistic  expectations,  and  failure  to  provide  scientifically  demonstrable  success 
are  among  the  factors  responsible  for  this  decline.  Significantly,  every  assessment 
of weather modification dating from the first National Academies’ report in 1964 has 
found  that  scientific  proof  of  the  effectiveness  of  cloud  seeding  was  lacking  (with  a 
few notable exceptions, such as the dispersion of cold fog). Each assessment also has 
called  for  a  dedicated  research  effort  directed  at  removing  or  reducing  basic  sci-
entific  uncertainties  before  proceeding  with  the  application  of  weather  modification 
methods. Yet, this type of intensive, committed effort has not been carried out. 

In  this,  the  latest  National  Academies’  assessment  of  weather  modification,  the 
Committee  was  charged  to  provide  an  updated  assessment  of  the  ability  of  current 
and  proposed  weather  modification  capabilities  to  provide  beneficial  impacts  on 
water resource management and weather hazard mitigation. It was asked to exam-
ine new technologies, such as ground-based, in situ, and satellite detection systems, 
and  fast  reacting  seeding  materials  and  dispensing  methods.  The  Committee  also 
was  asked  to  review  advances  in  numerical  modeling  on  the  cloud  and  mesoscale 
and consider how improvements in computer capabilities might be applied to weath-
er modification. This study was not designed to address policy implications of weath-
er  modification;  rather  it  focused  on  the  research  and  operational  issues.  Specifi-
cally, the Committee was asked to:

• review the current state of the sciences of weather modification and the role of 
weather  prediction  as  it  applies  to  weather  modification,  paying  particular  at-
tention to the technological and methodological developments of the last decade;

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

14

science and operation;

• identify  the  critical  uncertainties  limiting  advances  in  weather  modification 
• identify  future  directions  in  weather  modification  research  and  operations  for 
improving  the  management  of  water  resources  and  the  reduction  in  severe 
weather hazards; and
• suggest  actions  to  identify  the  potential  impacts  of  localized  weather  modifica-

tion on large-scale weather and climate patterns.

Issues and Trends in Weather Modification 
Motivation 

Increasing demands for water make the potential for enhancing the sources, stor-
age,  and  recycling  of  freshwater  a  legitimate  area  of  study.  Destruction  and  loss  of 
life due to severe weather, which is increasing with population growth and changing 
demographics,  require  that  we  examine  ways  to  reduce  these  impacts.  In  addition, 
there  is  ample  evidence  that  human  activities,  such  as  the  emission  of  industrial 
air pollution, can alter atmospheric processes on scales ranging from local precipita-
tion  patterns  to  global  climate.  These  inadvertent  impacts  on  weather  and  climate 
require  a  concerted  research  effort,  yet  the  scientific  community  has  largely  failed 
to  take  advantage  of  the  fact  that  many  of  the  scientific  underpinnings  of  inten-
tional and unintentional weather modification are the same. 
Current Operational and Research Efforts 

Operational  weather  modification  programs,  which  primarily  involve  cloud-seed-
ing activities aimed at enhancing precipitation or mitigating hail fall, exist in more 
than 24 countries, and there were at least 66 operational programs being conducted 
in 10 states across the United States in 2001. No Federal funding currently is sup-
porting  any  of  these  operational  activities  in  the  United  States.  Despite  the  large 
number  of  operational  activities,  less  than  a  handful  of  weather  modification  re-
search  programs  are  being  conducted  worldwide.  After  reaching  a  peak  of  $20  mil-
lion  per  year  in  the  late  1970s,  support  for  weather  modification  research  in  the 
United States has dropped to less than $500,000 per year. 
The Paradox 

Clearly,  there  is  a  paradox  in  these  divergent  trends:  The  Federal  Government 
is  not  willing  to  fund  research  to  understand  the  efficacy  of  weather  modification 
technologies,  but  others  are  willing  to  spend  funds  to  apply  these  unproven  tech-
niques.  Central  to  this  paradox  is  the  failure  of  past  cloud-seeding  experiments  to 
provide  an  adequate  verification  of  attempts  at  modifying  the  weather.  A  catch-22 
ensues  in  which  the  inability  to  provide  acceptable  proof  damages  the  credibility  of 
the  entire  field,  resulting  in  diminished  scientific  effort  to  address  problems  whose 
solutions would almost certainly lead to better evaluations. 
Limitations and Problems 

The dilemma in weather modification thus remains. We know that human activi-
ties  can  affect  the  weather,  and  we  know  that  seeding  will  cause  some  changes  to 
a  cloud.  However,  we  still  are  unable  to  translate  these  induced  changes  into 
verifiable  changes  in  rainfall,  hail  fall,  and  snowfall  on  the  ground,  or  to  employ 
methods  that  produce  credible,  repeatable  changes  in  precipitation.  Among  the  fac-
tors that have contributed to an almost uniform failure to verify seeding effects are 
such  uncertainties  as  the  natural  variability  of  precipitation,  the  inability  to  meas-
ure these variables with the required accuracy or resolution, the detection of a small 
induced  effect  under  these  conditions,  and  the  need  to  randomize  and  replicate  ex-
periments. 
Conclusions 

The  Committee  concludes  that  there  still  is  no  convincing  scientific  proof  of  the 
efficacy  of  intentional  weather  modification  efforts.  In  some  instances  there  are 
strong  indications  of  induced  changes,  but  this  evidence  has  not  been  subjected  to 
tests  of  significance  and  reproducibility.  This  does  not  challenge  the  scientific  basis 
of  weather  modification  concepts.  Rather  it  is  the  absence  of  adequate  under-
standing  of  critical  atmospheric  processes  that,  in  turn,  lead  to  a  failure  in  pro-
ducing  predictable,  detectable,  and  verifiable  results.  Questions  such  as  the  trans-
ferability  of  seeding  techniques  or  whether  seeding  in  one  location  can  reduce  pre-
cipitation  in  other  areas  can  only  be  addressed  through  sustained  research  of  the 
underlying science combined with carefully crafted hypotheses and physical and sta-
tistical experiments. 

Despite the lack of scientific proof, the Committee concludes that scientific under-
standing  has  progressed  on  many  fronts  since  the  last  National  Academies’  report 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

15

and that there have been many promising developments and advances. For instance, 
there  have  been  substantial  improvements  in  the  ice-nucleating  capabilities  of  new 
seeding  materials.  Recent  experiments  using  hygroscopic  seeding  particles  in  water 
and ice (mixed-phase) clouds have shown encouraging results, with precipitation in-
creases  attributed  to  increasing  the  lifetime  of  the  rain-producing  systems.  There 
are  strong  suggestions  of  positive  seeding  effects  in  winter  orographic  glaciogenic 
systems  (i.e.,  cloud  systems  occurring  over  mountainous  terrain).  Satellite  imagery 
has underlined the role of high concentrations of aerosols in influencing clouds, rain, 
and lightning, thus drawing the issues of intentional and inadvertent weather modi-
fication  closer  together.  This  and  other  recent  work  has  highlighted  critical  ques-
tions  about  the  microphysical  processes  leading  to  precipitation,  the  transport  and 
dispersion of seeding material in the cloud volume, the effects of seeding on the dy-
namical growth of clouds, and the logistics of translating storm-scale effects into an 
area-wide  precipitation  effect.  By  isolating  these  critical  questions,  which  currently 
hamper progress in weather modification, future research efforts can be focused and 
optimized. 

Additional  advances  in  observational,  computational,  and  statistical  technologies 
have been made over the past two to three decades that could be applied to weather 
modification.  These  include,  respectively,  the  capabilities  to  (1)  detect  and  quantify 
relevant  variables  on  temporal  and  spatial  scales  not  previously  possible;  (2)  ac-
quire,  store,  and  process  vast  quantities  of  data;  and  (3)  account  for  sources  of  un-
certainty  and  incorporate  complex  spatial  and  temporal  relationships.  Computer 
power  has  enabled  the  development  of  models  that  range  in  scale  from  a  single 
cloud  to  the  global  atmosphere.  Numerical  modeling  simulations—validated  by  ob-
servations  whenever  possible—are  useful  for  testing  intentional  weather  modifica-
tion  and  corresponding  larger-scale  effects.  Few  of  these  tools,  however,  have  been 
applied  in  any  collective  and  concerted  fashion  to  resolve  critical  uncertainties  in 
weather  modification.  These  numerous  methodological  advances  thus  have  not  re-
sulted in greater scientific understanding of the principles underlying weather modi-
fication.  This  has  not  been  due  to  flawed  science  but  to  the  lack  of  support  for  this 
particular  field  of  the  science  over  the  past  few  decades.  As  a  result  there  still  is 
no  conclusive  scientific  proof  of  the  efficacy  of  intentional  weather  modification,  al-
though the probabilities for seeding-induced alterations are high in some instances. 
Despite  this  lack  of  scientific  proof,  operational  weather  modification  programs  to 
increase rain and snowfall and to suppress hail formation continue worldwide based 
on cost versus probabilistic benefit analyses. 
Recommendations 

Recommendation: Because weather modification could potentially contribute to al-
leviating  water  resource  stresses  and  severe  weather  hazards,  because  weather 
modification  is  being  attempted  regardless  of  scientific  proof  supporting  or  refuting 
its  efficacy,  because  inadvertent  atmospheric  changes  are  a  reality,  and  because  an 
entire  suite  of  new  tools  and  techniques  now  exist  that  could  be  applied  to  this 
issue,  the  Committee  recommends  that  there  be  a  renewed  commitment  to  advanc-
ing  our  knowledge  of  fundamental  atmospheric  processes  that  are  central  to  the 
issues  of  intentional  and  inadvertent  weather  modification.  The  lessons  learned 
from  such  research  are  likely  to  have  implications  well  beyond  issues  of  weather 
modification.  Sustainable  use  of  atmospheric  water  resources  and  mitigation  of  the 
risks posed by hazardous weather are important goals that deserve to be addressed 
through a sustained research effort. 

Recommendation:  The  Committee  recommends  that  a  coordinated  national  pro-
gram  be  developed  to  conduct  a  sustained  research  effort  in  the  areas  of  cloud  and 
precipitation  microphysics,  cloud  dynamics,  cloud  modeling,  and  cloud  seeding;  it 
should  be  implemented  using  a  balanced  approach  of  modeling,  laboratory  studies, 
and field measurements designed to reduce the key uncertainties listed in Box ES.1. 
This  program  should  not  focus  on  near-term  operational  applications  of  weather 
modification;  rather  it  should  address  fundamental  research  questions  from  these 
areas  that  currently  impede  progress  and  understanding  of  intentional  and  inad-
vertent weather modification. Because a comprehensive set of specific research ques-
tions  cannot  possibly  be  listed  here,  they  should  be  defined  by  individual  proposals 
funded  by  a  national  program.  Nevertheless,  examples  of  such  questions  may  in-
clude the following:

• What  is  the  background  aerosol  concentration  in  various  places,  at  different 
times  of  the  year,  and  during  different  meteorological  conditions?  To  what  ex-
tent  would  weather  modification  operations  be  dependent  on  these  background 
concentrations?

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

16

• What  is  the  variability  of  cloud  and  cell  properties  (including  structure,  inten-
sity, evolution, and lifetime) within larger clusters, and how do clouds and cells 
interact  with  larger-scale  systems?  What  are  the  effects  of  localized  seeding  on 
the larger systems in which the seeded clouds are embedded?

• How accurate are radar reflectivity measurements in measuring the differences 
between accumulated rainfall in seeded and unseeded clouds? How does seeding 
affect  the  drop-size  distribution  that  determines  the  relationship  between  the 
measured radar parameter and actual rainfall at the surface?

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Summary of Key Uncertainties 

The statements in boldface type are considered to have the highest priority. 

BOX ES.1

Cloud/precipitation microphysics issues 

• Background concentration, sizes, and chemical composition of aerosols 

that participate in cloud processes

• Nucleation  processes  as  they  relate  to  chemical  composition,  sizes,  and  con-

centrations of hygroscopic aerosol particles

• Ice nucleation (primary and secondary)
• Evolution of the droplet spectra in clouds and processes that contribute to spec-

tra broadening and the onset of coalescence

• Relative importance of drizzle in precipitation processes

Cloud dynamics issues 

• Cloud-to-cloud and mesoscale interactions as they relate to updraft and 

downdraft structures and cloud evolution and lifetimes

• Cloud  and  sub-cloud  dynamical  interactions  as  they  relate  to  precipitation 

amounts and the size spectrum of hydrometeors

• Microphysical, thermodynamical, and dynamical interactions within clouds

Cloud modeling issues 

• Combination of the best cloud models with advanced observing systems 

in carefully designed field tests and experiments

• Extension  of  existing  and  development  of  new  cloud-resolving  models  explicitly 

applied to weather modification

• Application of short-term predictive models including precipitation forecasts and 
data  assimilation  and  adjoint  methodology  in  treated  and  untreated  situations
• Evaluation of predictive models for severe weather events and establishment of 

current predictive capabilities including probabilistic forecasts

• Advancement  of  the  capabilities  in  cloud  models  to  simulate  dispersion  trajec-

tories of seeding material

• Use of cloud models to examine effects of cloud seeding outside of seeded areas
• Combination  of  cloud  models  with  statistical  analysis  to  establish  seeding  ef-

fects

Seeding-related issues 

• Targeting  of  seeding  agents,  diffusion  and  transport  of  seeding  mate-

rial, and spread of seeding effects throughout the cloud volume

• Measurement  capabilities  and  limitations  of  cell-tracking  software, 

radar, and technologies to observe seeding effects

• Analysis  of  recent  observations  with  new  instruments  of  high  concentrations  of 

• Interactions  between  different  hydrometeors  in  clouds  and  how  to  best  model 

ice crystals

them

• Modeling and prediction of treated and untreated conditions for simulation
• Mechanisms  of  transferring  the  storm-scale  effect  into  an  area-wide  precipita-
tion effect and tracking possible downwind changes at the single cell, cloud clus-
ter, and floating target scales 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

17

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
The  tasks  involved  in  weather  modification  research  fall  within  the  mission  re-
sponsibilities  of  several  government  departments  and  agencies,  and  careful  coordi-
nation of these tasks will be required. 

gram include: 

Recommendation: The Committee recommends that this coordinated research pro-
• Capitalizing  on  new  remote  and  in  situ  observational  tools  to  carry  out  explor-
atory  and  confirmatory  experiments  in  a  variety  of  cloud  and  storm  systems 
(e.g.,  Doppler  lidars  and  airborne  radars,  microwave  radiometers,  millimeter-
wave  and  polarimetric  cloud  radars,  global  positioning  system  (GPS)  and  cell-
tracking software, the Cloud Particle Imager, the Gerber Particle Volume Mon-
itor, the Cloud Droplet Spectrometer). Initial field studies should concentrate on 
areas that are amenable to accurate numerical simulation and multiparameter, 
three-dimensional  observations  that  allow  the  testing  of  clearly  formulated 
physical  hypotheses.  Some  especially  promising  possibilities  where  substantial 
further progress may occur (not listed in any priority) include:
—Hygroscopic  seeding  to  enhance  rainfall.  The  small-scale  experiments  and 
larger-scale coordinated field efforts proposed by the Mazatlan workshop on hy-
groscopic  seeding  (WMO,  2000)  could  form  a  starting  point  for  such  efforts.  A 
randomized  seeding  program  with  concurrent  physical  measurements  (con-
ducted over a period as short as three years) could help scientists to either con-
firm or discard the statistical results of recent experiments.
—Orographic  cloud  seeding  to  enhance  precipitation.  Such  a  program  could 
build  on  existing  operational  activities  in  the  mountainous  western  United 
States. A randomized program that includes strong modeling and observational 
components,  employing  advanced  computational  and  observational  tools,  could 
substantially  enhance  our  understanding  of  seeding  effects  and  winter 
orographic precipitation.
—Studies  of  specific  seeding  effects.  This  may  include  studies  such  as  those  of 
the  initial  droplet  broadening  and  subsequent  formation  of  drizzle  and  rain  as-
sociated with hygroscopic seeding, or of the role of large (>1 µm) particles (e.g., 
sea spray) in reducing droplet concentrations in polluted regions where precipi-
tation  is  suppressed  due  to  excess  concentrations  of  small  cloud  condensation 
nuclei (CCN).

• Improving  cloud  model  treatment  of  cloud  and  precipitation  physics.  Special 
focus is needed on modeling CCN, ice nuclei processes, and the growth, collision, 
breakup,  and  coalescence  of  water  drops  and  ice  particles.  Such  studies  must 
be based on cloud physics laboratory measurements, tested and tuned in model 
studies, and validated by in situ and ground observations.
• Improving  and  using  current  computational  and  data  assimilation  capabilities. 
Advances  are  needed  to  allow  rapid  processing  of  large  quantities  of  data  from 
new  observations  and  better  simulation  of  moist  cloud  and  precipitation  proc-
esses.  These  models  could  subsequently  be  used  as  planning  and  diagnostic 
tools in future weather modification studies, and to develop techniques to assist 
in the evaluation of seeding effects.
• Capitalizing  on  existing  field  facilities  and  developing  partnerships  among  re-
search  groups  and  select  operational  programs.  Research  in  weather  modifica-
tion  should  take  full  advantage  of  opportunities  offered  by  other  field  research 
programs and by operational weather modification activities. Modest additional 
research efforts directed at the types of research questions mentioned above can 
be  added  with  minimal  interference  to  existing  programs.  A  particularly  prom-
ising  opportunity  for  such  a  partnership  is  the  Department  of  Energy  Atmos-
pheric  Radiation  Measurement  program/Cloud  and  Radiation  Test  bed  (DOE 
ARM/CART)  site  in  the  southern  Great  Plains  (Oklahoma/Kansas)  augmented 
by  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA)  Global  Precipi-
tation Mission. This site provides a concentration of the most advanced observ-
ing  systems  and  an  infrastructural  base  for  sustained  basic  research.  The  Na-
tional  Center  for  Atmospheric  Research  (NCAR)  and  the  National  Oceanic  and 
Atmospheric  Administration’s  Environmental  Technology  Laboratory  (NOAA/
ETL)  also  could  serve  as  important  focal  points  for  weather  modification  re-
search.

In  pursuing  research  related  to  weather  modification  explicit,  financial  and  colle-
gial  support  should  be  given  to  young  aspiring  scientists  to  enable  them  to  con-
tribute  to  our  fundamental  store  of  knowledge  about  methods  to  enhance  atmos-
pheric resources and reduce the impacts of hazardous weather. It must be acknowl-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

18

edged that issues related to weather modification go well beyond the limits of phys-
ical science. Such issues involve society as a whole, and scientific weather modifica-
tion  research  should  be  accompanied  by  parallel  social,  political,  economic,  environ-
mental, and legal studies. 

The Committee emphasizes that weather modification should be viewed as a fun-
damental  and  legitimate  element  of  atmospheric  and  environmental  science.  Owing 
to  the  growing  demand  for  fresh  water,  the  increasing  levels  of  damage  and  loss  of 
life resulting from severe weather, the undertaking of operational activities without 
the guidance of a careful scientific foundation, and the reality of inadvertent atmos-
pheric  changes,  the  scientific  community  now  has  the  opportunity,  challenge,  and 
responsibility to assess the potential efficacy and value of intentional weather modi-
fication technologies. 
Closing Thoughts 

The Academy Committee emphasizes that weather modification should be viewed 
as a fundamental and legitimate element of atmospheric and environmental science. 
The  growing  demand  for  fresh  water,  the  increasing  levels  of  damage  and  loss  of 
life resulting from severe weather, the undertaking of operational activities without 
the guidance of a careful scientific foundation, and the reality of inadvertent atmos-
pheric  changes  gives  the  scientific  community  the  opportunity,  challenge,  and  the 
responsibility  to  determine  how  and  to  what  extent  humans  can  influence  the 
weather.

Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Doctor. 
Chairman Hutchison is here. I believe she would like to make an 

opening statement. 

STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

Senator HUTCHISON [presiding]. Thank you. 
Well,  I  very  much  appreciate  the  three  of  you  coming.  I’m  sorry 
I’m late, but I do want to talk to you. I’ve read your testimony, and 
I’ve  also  read  the  executive  summary  of  the  report  in  which  you 
participated.  This  was  an  issue  brought  to  me  by  a  distinguished 
former  State  Senator  from  Texas,  John  Leedom,  who  is  with  us 
today, and his wife, Betty, I see. But I thought that the points that 
he made to me were certainly worth pursuing. 

And  it  seems  to  me,  from  all  of  your  testimony,  that  further  re-
search  is  something  that  the  scientific  community  wants  to  see 
happen.  And  I  think,  from  what  Dr.  Garstang  has  just  said,  that 
the  view  of  the  scientific  community  and  the  committee  that  you 
are on is that we shouldn’t be running out there doing things until 
we have the research that either proves what the long-term effects 
are going to be, or not. And I think it’s very important that we pur-
sue this research, which is why I’ve introduced the legislation. 

I am very interested in the findings and recommendations of the 
Committee in which they say that it is recommended that we have 
a sustained research effort in this area. And I want to pursue this 
a  little  further  when  we  get  into  questions.  I  know  that  Senator 
DeMint  has  to  be  on  the  floor  at  3  p.m.,  so  I’m  going  to  defer  to 
him  to  ask  his  questions  first.  But  I  am  going  to  want  to  talk  to 
the  three  of  you  about  how  we  should  pursue  this  research,  which 
is the purpose of my bill, and to get the best results, and especially 
to  determine,  from  what  was  said  in  the  report—that  there  is  a 
growing  demand  for  fresh  water,  the  increasing  levels  of  damage 
and  loss  resulting  from  severe  weather—would  indicate  that  we 
should be researching what we can do to mitigate damage and also 
provide  a  more  steady,  even,  and  balanced  source  of  fresh  water, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

19

rather  than  having  a  Hurricane  Katrina  while  there  is  a  drought 
in other parts of our country. 

So,  I  will  pursue  that,  but  I  will  yield  to  Senator  DeMint,  be-
cause  he  has  another—this,  I  will  tell  you,  just  so  that  you  under-
stand—because  this  is  the  last  week  or  10  days  of  our  session,  all 
of  us  have  hearings  and  conference  committees,  which  is  what  I 
had to attend earlier, and why I’m late. We had a conference com-
mittee  on  our  transportation  bill,  and  I’m  sure  you’re  going  to  the 
floor for your bill. So, why don’t you go——

Senator DEMINT. OK. 
Senator HUTCHISON.—forward, and I will——
Senator DEMINT. Thank you——
Senator HUTCHISON.—follow you. 
Senator DEMINT.—Chairman. 
Just  a  quick  question,  and  I  will  have  to  leave  in  a  just  a  mo-

ment, but——

This is a fascinating subject for me. The idea that we could actu-
ally  impact  weather  is  exciting  and,  I  guess,  frightening,  in  some 
ways. But, Dr. Golden, you mentioned just some successes, the suc-
cesses  of  adding  to  the  snowfall  in  mountains  and,  again,  I  guess 
we  can’t  get  into  a  lot  of  science  today,  but  I  assume  if  we’re  able 
to  get  additional  snow  in  one  area,  that  some  other  area  is  not 
going  to  get  as  much  rainfall  or  moisture-fall.  I  mean,  we’re  not 
putting  more  moisture  in  the  air,  we’re  just  collecting  it  in  a  dif-
ferent place. Is that the concept? 

Dr.  GOLDEN.  This  is  one  of  the  very  areas  that  we  need  to  do  a 
lot  of  additional  research  under  Senator  Hutchison’s  bill.  But  the 
work  that  has  been  done—and  there  are—we  did  some  of  this  on 
our  FACE  program  in  Florida.  We  looked  at  what  you’re  talking 
about is extra-area effects. If you seed in a target area, are you rob-
bing  Peter  to  pay  Paul  in  areas  that  are  downwind?  And  both  in 
the  FACE  Project,  as  well  as  in  other  States—in  Utah,  we  looked 
at  possible  downwind  effects  from  seeding  in  the  mountains  of 
Utah.  Did  they  see  any  decreased  snowfall  in  Southwestern  Wyo-
ming?  The  answer  is  no.  Even  the  most  ardent  proponents  of  the 
mountain  seeding  will  tell  you  that  you’re  only  processing—you’re 
only  affecting  a  very  small  fraction  of  the  water  vapor  that  passes 
over  the  mountains.  And  so,  all  of  the  results  in  both  winter 
oragraphic  mountain  seeding,  as  well  as  convective  storm  seeding 
suggests that either you have no effect downwind or it’s a slight in-
crease.  But,  again,  there  needs  to  be  additional  research.  There’s 
nothing  that  suggests  large  increases  outside  your  target  area.  It’s 
either no effect or very weak positive effect. 

Senator  DEMINT.  And  you  mentioned  other  countries  apparently 
using  this  successfully.  I  mean,  are  there  any  studies  that  the  sci-
entific  community  would  recognize  that  says  Australia,  or,  I  think 
you  mentioned,  China,  have  actually  been  successful  in  weather 
modification? 

Dr.  GOLDEN.  Some  of  them,  yes,  but  it’s  still—I  think  what  Dr. 
Garstang  says  is  true,  there  still  needs  to  be  work  on  evaluation. 
And while I’m not a strong proponent of using only statistical eval-
uation,  I  think,  for  example,  there  are—some  of  the  new  computer 
models and tracers—we now have come a long way in just the last 
10  years;  and  this  is  an  effort  that  we  pioneered  in  this  country. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

20

There  are  now  tracer  techniques  that  you  can  use  right  when  you 
seed  to  tell  you  not  only  how  much  increase  in  snow  is  due  to  the 
seeding,  but  how  much  of  the  seeding  material  actually  made  it 
into  the  snow  that  fell.  And  so,  this  has  just  been  developed  over 
the last 10 years, and they’re just starting to apply this technology 
in the Australia program. So——

Senator DEMINT. Well, thank——
Senator HUTCHISON. Could I ask a question just on that——
Senator DEMINT. Sure. 
Senator HUTCHISON.—same subject, while you’re here? 
There  are  ten  States  and  probably  66  operational  modification 
programs  just  ongoing  now  by  States  and  local  water  agencies.  Is 
there  any  place  that  those  projects  that  are  ongoing,  operations 
that are ongoing, where data is collected at a central point so that 
we do see the effects of those particular operations as they are sup-
posed to be working? 

Dr. GOLDEN. No. You raise a very good point. I mean, that’s what 
we’re  all  about  today,  is—I  talked  to  one  of  the  biggest  operators 
that  supports  many  of  these  programs,  both  in  the  U.S.—many  of 
the  operational  weather  modification  programs—and  they  told  me 
that—he  estimates  that  there  is  now  an  expenditure  per  year,  a 
combined expenditure, just in our country, of $25 to $30 million per 
year  on  operations.  But  since  the  demise  of  my  AMP  program, 
there  is  no  central  focus.  And,  frankly,  most  of  the  operational 
groups  that  support  the  seeding  activity  feel  that  most  of  their 
funding  has  to  go  to  the  seeding  effort,  to  the  operations.  So,  they 
look  to  the  Government.  They  look  to  the  Federal  Government  to 
play the major role here. 

To be honest with you, some of them, recognizing the value of re-
search to helping them evaluate what they do, are supporting small 
research  efforts.  The  newest  entry  into  this,  by  the  way,  is  the 
State of Wyoming. They’re about to start a new $8 million program 
of snowpack seeding enhancement. 

Senator HUTCHISON. At the very least, we ought to be——
Senator DEMINT. Yes. 
Senator HUTCHISON.—gathering the data. 
Senator  DEMINT.  So,  we’re  spending  $25  million  a  year,  but  we 
really don’t have any quantitative data that suggests that it works, 
just  more  of  an—empirical  evidence  that  people  believe  there  is 
some impact, right? 

Dr.  GOLDEN.  They  do  their  own  evaluation.  No,  I  don’t  mean  to 
say—they are not—not much of that money is going to support any 
of the research that Dr. Garstang recommended in his report. Most 
of that is for their operations and some evaluation. 

Senator HUTCHISON. But nothing is gathered nationally——
Dr. GOLDEN. Right. 
Senator HUTCHISON.—to see what the effects are. 
Senator DEMINT. You’re going to have to excuse me. 
Senator HUTCHISON. OK, thank you. 
I  wanted  to  ask  you,  because  we’ve  been  through  some  particu-
larly  bad  weather  situations  this  year,  is  there  any  thought  in  the 
scientific community that you could, by, say, seeding, maybe, a hur-
ricane  in  the  early  stages,  that  you  could  lessen  its  effect,  make  it 
start  dropping  earlier,  and  lessen  its  effect  when  it  hits  land?  Is 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

21

there  any  potential  for  that  kind  of  modification?  We’ve  been  talk-
ing about modification, obviously, over land, where you’re trying to 
get  rain  for  crops.  But  we  also  are  looking  at  ways  to  maybe  even 
out  the  kind  of  weather  and  rainfall  that  we  would  have.  Is  there 
any  hope  that  we  could  eventually  use  some  kind  of  scientific 
means like this to take out the violence of a storm? 

Dr. GARSTANG. I’ll pick that one up, Senator Hutchison. 
Yes,  as  Dr.  Golden  said,  there  was  a  program,  STORMFURY, 
that  did,  indeed,  attempt  to—and  they  used  the  word  ‘‘moderate’’ 
a  hurricane,  change  its  wind  speeds.  And  although  it’s  controver-
sial  now,  there  was  a  conclusion  that  they  had,  indeed,  got  evi-
dence for a reduction of 15 percent in the wind speeds. Now, if you 
take  a  hurricane  wind  from  100  miles  an  hour  down  to  85  miles 
an hour, the damage is the square of the wind velocity, so you miti-
gate  damage  considerably.  However,  as  I  said,  there’s  question 
about that. 

There are no current methodologies that could be employed to re-
duce  or  to  deflect  a  hurricane.  However,  there  are  very  promising 
computer  models  that  are  beginning  to  suggest  how  we  might  ap-
proach  this.  And,  interestingly  enough  from  what  Dr.  Golden  said, 
one of the most advanced pieces of work is being done by the Euro-
pean  community’s  National  Center  for  Meteorology  or  long-range/
medium-range  forecasting.  And  it’s  using  our  ideas.  But  there  are 
efforts in this country where the model suggests that very small ef-
fects  might  have  quite  drastic  consequences.  And  this  is  a  char-
acteristic of the atmosphere. 

I’m  sure  you  know  that  the  whole  theory  of  chaos  came  from  a 
meteorologist, Dr. Ed Lorenz, from MIT, where he was trying to de-
termine  what,  in  all  these  small  effects—and  to  use  the  kind  of 
analogy  that  he  used,  the  flapping  of  a  butterfly’s  wings  in  Brazil 
creates a tornado in Kansas. In other words, these very tiny effects 
can have, ultimately, very large consequences. 

Models now are being used to find these. Are they there, and can 
we  find  them?  And  Dr.  Ross  Hoffman’s  work  suggests  that,  yes, 
they are. It’s not clear how you would necessarily bring that about, 
but  if  we  don’t  pursue  this  work,  we  will  never  know  the  answer. 

So, the answer is: not right now, but yes in the future. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you. 
Dr. DeFelice? 
Dr.  DEFELICE.  Yes,  I’d  like  to  just  add  to  this.  I  think  the—ex-
cuse  me,  technical  difficulties—I  think  under  your  bill,  once  it’s 
passed,  I  would  recommend  to  the  board  an  implementation  plan 
for the research that would be conducted under it, and part of that 
plan  would  involve  hurricane  modification  and  some  of  the  issues 
that my distinguished colleagues have mentioned. But I would just 
want  to  emphasize  the  need  to  do  modeling  studies  to  test  all  pos-
sible  seeding  scenarios  relative  to  the  result  of  those  inputs.  Get 
the best models that we can on hurricanes, because there are real-
ly—there’s  some  really  good  ones  out  there,  even  in  the  United 
States.  And  then  have  some  of  our  computer  scientists  add  a  com-
puter  program—or  a  subroutine  that  would  act  like  we  were  seed-
ing them, but not do any seeding. 

Under  our  plan,  the  implementation  plan  for  this  bill,  there 
would  be  no  way  that  the  Government  would  be  doing  any  oper-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

22

add to it. 

ational cloud-seeding or anything like that. They would—hurricane 
modification  and  all  that  research  would  have  to  be  done  by  mod-
els.  And  once  the  modeling  studies  were  complete,  then  one  might 
form a hypothesis which might be testable out in the field. But we 
would  know  what  would  happen  or  think  we  know  what  would 
happen,  based  on  the  models.  I  just  wanted  to  emphasize  the  use 
of  models  in  any  severe-storm  type  of  modification  research  that 
happens under this bill. At least that would be my view and hope. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  If  you  were  going  to  do  an  implementation 
plan—say,  we  pass  the  bill,  we  have  appointments  to  the  board, 
and  you  would  want  a  representative  board  from  the  different 
areas  of  weather  expertise,  but  what  areas  do  you  think  would  be 
the most productive in which to do research? Obviously, cloud-seed-
ing  for  fresh  water.  And  hurricane  or  violent  weather  modification 
would be two. What else could we gain from this kind of effort? 

Dr.  DEFELICE.  I’ll  start,  and  then  I’m  sure  there’ll  be  plenty  to 

I  would  think  that  we  might  consider  looking  into  clearing  out 
fog in the vicinity of airports, and perhaps other areas, particularly 
in the Northeast, which might benefit from increased sunlight par-
ticularly during the winter. So, these would be cold clouds. Another 
area  would  be  hygroscopic  seeding.  And  there’s  a  lot  that’s  not 
known about that. There’s a lot of promising results. 

Senator HUTCHISON. ‘‘Hygroscopic,’’ being? 
Dr.  DEFELICE.  Putting  small  salt  nuclei  into  the  proper  part  of 
the  cloud  so  that  those  nuclei  would  help  enhance  the  interaction 
between  the  droplets  in  the  cloud,  so  that  would  then,  in  turn, 
produce more precipitation. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Is  that  different  from  other  types  of  cloud-

seeding, or are there different forms? 

Dr.  DEFELICE.  It’s  just  that—that  is  different  in  the  sense  that 
it’s  just  a  different  way  to  trigger  the  precipitation  process  in  the 
cloud. You can use agents that would grow ice crystals in the cloud. 
But those clouds would have to be cold enough for the ice to exist, 
if it was to form. 

Senator HUTCHISON. OK. 
Dr. DEFELICE. But those would be the primary areas. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Any others? 
Dr.  GOLDEN.  I  want  to  emphasize—and  I  wish  Senator  DeMint 
were  here—that  one  of  the  terrible  things  that  happened  when  we 
cut  STORMFURY  in  the  early  1980s  was  that,  beginning  at  that 
point, the research funding for hurricane research in NOAA stead-
ily declined. And it’s declined ever since. The other thing that hap-
pened  is  that  most  of  our  research  on  cloud  physics  evaporated. 
People  left  the  agency,  people  changed  their  careers.  In  fact,  there 
are almost no cloud physicists left—cloud physicists in NOAA have 
become an endangered species. 

Why is that important? It means that if you don’t understand the 
cloud  physics,  as  Dr.  Garstang  emphasized,  you  have  no  hope  of 
understanding how you might beneficially modify clouds to produce 
increased  rainfall.  And  that  feeds  back  into  being  able  to  predict 
heavy  rain  and  heavy  snow.  In  other  words,  this  is  one  of  the  top 
priorities  for  my  colleagues  in  the  National  Weather  Service.  I 
mean, we all get frustrated that our skill scores, our forecast accu-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

23

racies  for  heavy  rain  or  heavy  snow  aren’t  what  they  need  to  be. 
And  so,  this  is  all  linked  together,  so  that  there  is  no  doubt  in  my 
mind  that  any  investment  by  this  bill  in  weather  modification  re-
search will yield big payoffs in the prediction arena. And, as I said 
in  my  testimony,  ultimately  we’re  never  going  to  be  able  to  con-
vince  ourselves  or  anyone  else  that  we’re  successful  in  weather 
modification unless we can do a good job of predicting the unmodi-
fied  natural  event.  That’s  the—that’s  one  of  the  most  fundamental 
questions. 

Dr. GARSTANG. I certainly agree with all of those sentiments. But 
I’d  like  to  emphasize  that  if  the  bill  could  bring  cohesive  and  sus-
tained  effort  directed  at  solving  the  outstanding  problems  that  we 
know are roadblocks to our progress, if you can remove these road-
blocks,  you  can  progress.  And  if  you  simultaneously,  with  this  co-
herent  program,  brought  to  bear  on  it  all  of  the  technological  ad-
vances that have occurred in the last 30 years, there would be im-
mediate  and  tremendous  advances.  Dr.  Golden  has  referred  to  a 
couple. 

For  example,  in  the  successful,  I  think,  attempts  at  increasing 
snowpack  on  the  Sierras  and  western  slopes  of  the  Rockies,  we 
didn’t know where the seeding material was going. We now can de-
termine precisely where it’s going. And often it didn’t go where we 
thought it was going, didn’t go where it would do any good. We also 
can precisely describe the flow fields through the cloud. We couldn’t 
do that 10 years ago. 

These  techniques  have  not  been  coherently  brought  to  bear  on 
weather  modification.  As  soon  as  we  do  that,  we  will  have  imme-
diate results. 

Let  me  give  you  an  analogy.  Let’s  assume  that  all  of  cardiac  in-
vestigations  were  prevented  from  using  the  technological  advances 
that have occurred in heart research over the last 20 years. Where 
would  we  be  in  preventing  heart  disease  today?  We  would  be  way 
behind where we are. 

We  have  not  brought  these  same  kind  of  sophisticated  tech-
niques, which are in place, to bear on the problem. And if you could 
create that situation where that was possible, you would get imme-
diate results. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Have you looked at my bill? I would like to 
ask  each  of  you.  And  do  you  have  any  suggestions  on  any  ways  to 
improve it? 

Basically,  what  I’m  trying  to  do  is  establish  this  research  and  a 
board  that  would  be  made  up  of  experts  from  these  various  areas 
with  various  expertise  that  would  be  advisory  to  the  Department 
of  Commerce  and  NOAA.  And  my  question  is,  Is  there  something 
that  you  would  suggest  that  would  make  it  any  more  able  to 
achieve the goal of more emphasis on research, an implementation 
of  the  research,  and  an  advisory  board  made  up  of  experts  that 
would  really  focus  the  Department  on  the  areas  that  should  be 
looked at that we’ve discussed? 

Dr.  DEFELICE.  I  think,  as—let  me  just  check—thank  you.  As  I 
looked  through  the  bill,  I  think  one  rule  of  thumb  that  I’d  like  to 
see—and  I  believe  I’ve  seen  this—was  to  have  a  multidisciplinary 
approach  to  the  research  agenda,  and  have  the  board  basically  get 
together  with  these  multidisciplinary  components  of  the  field  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

24

discuss the priorities. Now, we come up with priorities, and this is 
great.  And,  from  what  I  heard  they  make  sense.  But  there  might 
not be enough money to carry out all of those particular items. So, 
I  think  we  need  to  make  sure  that  we  have  representatives  from 
all  components  of  the  system  that  we’re  trying  to  research,  includ-
ing  the  general  public.  So,  if  the  general  public  is  going  to  be  in-
volved, then we might have to have an outreach component, which 
I  strongly  urge  be  in  there.  I  think  it  is.  And  we  would  want  rep-
resentatives  from  the  scientists—science  community,  maybe  some 
sociologists,  economics-type  people,  commerce,  and,  so  on.  But  the 
point  is,  we  want  people  that  are  affected  by  the  system,  and  we 
need  those  people  to  represent  each  component  of  that  system,  so 
that  when  we  do  develop  the  priorities,  everybody  will  be  rep-
resented  in  that  process,  and  will  be  part  of  it,  and  will—should 
stay with that process from beginning to end. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Well, I’d—we certainly——
Dr. DEFELICE.—that’s great. 
Senator HUTCHISON.—do have a multidisciplinary concept, and if 
there  are  any  other  disciplines  that  should  be  added,  I  would  like 
for you to write me a letter about that later. 

Yes? 
Dr.  GOLDEN.  No,  I  don’t  want  to  tinker  with  your  bill.  I  think 
that  the  board  is  well  represented.  Is  NSF—do  they  have  a  rep-
resentation on the board? 

Senator HUTCHISON. It is the—one representative of the National 
Center  for  Atmospheric  Research  of  the  National  Science  Founda-
tion. 

Dr. GOLDEN. OK. Because they, in the past—this is no longer the 
case,  but  in  the  past,  I  know  that  during  my  AMP  Program,  we 
did—some  of  the  States  actually  got—funded  proposals  through 
NSF, and then NSF has also stopped supporting weather modifica-
tion  research.  But,  I  mean,  your  bill—I  think  it’s  fine.  I  think  it 
says that the board can appoint extra staff, and it can appoint sub-
committees. And, no, I wouldn’t want to second-guess that. I think 
once  they’re  assembled,  then  they  can  start  tackling  this  issue  of 
national  priorities,  and  I  think  they’ll  come  to  the  AMS,  they’ll 
come  to  the  American  Society  of  Civil  Engineers,  they’ll  come, 
hopefully,  to  the  Weather  Modification  Association,  and—I  mean, 
these  are  the  venues  where  the  national  priorities  could  be  set.  I 
have no problem with that. 

Senator HUTCHISON. Dr. Garstang? 
Dr.  GARSTANG.  I  have  only  had  the  benefit  to  discuss  your  bill. 
I have not read it. We hadn’t—it wasn’t in time when I got notified 
to appear here. But I would be glad to look at it carefully, because 
I  gather,  from  both  yourself  and  from  discussions,  that  you’ve  in-
corporated a lot of ideas, results from the NRC report. And I would 
be  glad  to  send  these  to  you—to  your  staff  in  writing  right  away. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  I  would  really  be  pleased  if  you  would,  be-
cause  I  think  we  all  are  on  the  same  wavelength  regarding  the 
need  to  have  an  emphasis  here,  trying  to  implement  that  through 
an  advisory  board.  I  think  the  advisory  board—we  tried  to  make 
it representative of the different areas of expertise, and—so, I’d like 
to  move  the  bill,  so  I’d  like  to  have  all  of  your  comments  and  look 
forward to perhaps being able to do this in——

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

25

OK,  I’m  told  that  Senator  Ben  Nelson  had  a  witness  rec-
ommendation  who  was  unable  to  attend  the  hearing  and  has  sub-
mitted  a  statement  to  be  included  in  the  record,  Commander  Don-
ald  Wilhite,  Director  of  the  National  Drought  Mitigation  Center  at 
the University of Nebraska. * 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  OK.  Well,  I  have  no  further  questions.  Is 
there  anything  further  that  any  of  you  would  like  to  add  for  the 
record? 

[No response.] 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  If  not,  we  will  give  you  a  copy  of  the  bill, 
Dr.  Garstang.  And  I  hope  that  we  can  all  come  together.  And  I 
hope Senator DeMint will work with us, as well, to try to move this 
forward. 

Thank  you  very  much  for  your  time,  and  I  learned  a  lot,  and  I 
think we can make some great headway in this area with your ex-
pertise. 

Thank you. 
[Whereupon, at 3:25 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

* The information referred to has been printed in the Appendix. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEBRASKA 

Due  to  the  short  notice  of  the  scheduling  of  the  Joint  Subcommittee  hearing  on 
S. 517, ‘‘The Weather Modification Research and Technology Transfer Authorization 
Act  of  2005,’’  I  am  unable  to  attend  the  hearing  today.  This  is  an  important  issue 
and  I  regret  not  being  able  to  reschedule  prior  commitments  in  order  to  be  there. 
However, I did want to take the opportunity, as we discuss weather modification, 
to  highlight  an  area  of  research  that  is  happening  at  the  University  of  Nebraska 
related  to  drought  mitigation.  While  the  focus  of  this  hearing  is  weather  modifica-
tion,  I  believe  it  is  relevant  to  address  another  aspect  important  to  this  area  of  re-
search,  which  is  adequate  monitoring  of  weather  patterns  so  that  we  may  appro-
priately respond to and mitigate the effects of adverse weather. 

The National Drought Mitigation Center (NDMC), located at the University of Ne-
braska-Lincoln,  was  established  in  1995  and  performs  a  number  of  activities  of  im-
portance to Nebraska, the region, and the Nation. Its functions include maintaining 
a  web-based  information  clearinghouse,  drought  monitoring,  the  preparation  of  the 
weekly  U.S.  Drought  Monitor  (which  covers  all  50  states),  the  development  of 
drought policy and planning techniques, collaborative research on improved decision 
tools  for  agricultural  producers  and  natural  resource  managers,  and  outreach  and 
training  workshops  for  Federal,  State,  and  foreign  governments  and  organizations. 
The NDMC has worked with most states in the development of drought mitigation 
and  response  plans  aimed  at  reducing  vulnerability  to  episodes  of  severe  drought. 
The NDMC has worked closely with the Western Governors’ Association and NOAA 
in  formulating  the  proposal  for  a  National  Integrated  Drought  Information  System. 
This  system  is  currently  being  implemented  by  NOAA  with  the  assistance  of  the 
NDMC. 

With this statement, I am submitting a statement from Dr. Donald Wilhite, Direc-
tor of the NDMC, which details more fully the work they are doing at the University 
of  Nebraska.  I  believe  the  research  that  is  being  conducted  there  is  critical  to  our 
ability to respond to the devastating effects of drought. 

This  research  is  especially  relevant  to  Nebraska  and  other  Plains  states  right 
now, which have been experiencing drought conditions for several years; but the re-
search done by the NDMC has a national benefit. Droughts have plagued all regions 
of  the  country  over  the  past  10  years  and  many  parts  of  the  West  have  been  in 
drought  for  5  to  7  years.  They  are  often  slow  in  developing,  but  the  costs  and  indi-
rect effects have a substantial impact on water supplies, agriculture, energy produc-
tion,  natural  resources,  recreation  and  tourism,  transportation,  development,  and 
the environment. 

The effect of drought in recent years in my state has been devastating. Its impact 
has been felt throughout the economy of Nebraska. While drought typically does not 
produce  dramatic  news  footage  like  a  hurricane  or  tornado  will,  it  is  nonetheless, 
a disaster. 

I believe it is crucial to encourage more investment in research in programs such 
as  the  NDMC.  The  research  done  upfront  in  monitoring  drought  trends  will  help 
our capabilities to mitigate and respond to its effects in a much more effective man-
ner. I am hopeful that we can hold a hearing on drought in the Disaster Prevention 
and  Prediction  Subcommittee  next  year.  This  is  an  important  issue  that  I  believe 
warrants more discussion. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. DONALD WILHITE, DIRECTOR, NATIONAL DROUGHT 

MITIGATION CENTER, UNIVERSITY OF NEBRASKA-LINCOLN 

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  submit  this  statement  on  behalf  of  the  National 
Drought Mitigation Center (NDMC), which is located at the University of Nebraska 
in Lincoln. Climate variability is an important issue that affects everyone across the 

(27)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

28

United  States.  This  is  true  whether  it  is  related  to  heating  bills  for  the  upcoming 
winter;  to  El  Nin˜ o  or  La  Nin˜ a  events  that  might  cause  flooding  or  drought;  or  the 
frequency of natural hazards striking our Nation, like the numerous hurricanes dur-
ing  the  past  two  years.  The  truth  is  that  drought  is  one  of  the  costliest  hazards  to 
affect  the  country:  FEMA  has  estimated  that  the  annual  losses  due  to  drought  are 
approximately $8 billion, which is a higher estimate than for any other natural haz-
ard.  Hurricanes  Katrina,  Rita,  and  Wilma  may  change  that  placement  slightly,  but 
drought  remains  a  serious  threat  across  the  United  States.  The  impacts  resulting 
from  drought  are  complex,  and  as  our  vulnerability  to  droughts  changes  with  the 
shifting  pressures  on  the  Nation’s  finite  water  resources,  impacts  due  to  drought 
may increase in the future. 

I would like to emphasize that drought is a normal part of the climate across the 
United  States.  At  any  given  time,  approximately  14  percent  of  the  Nation  is  in  se-
vere  drought  or  worse.  It  is  also  important  to  note  that  multiple-year  events  (like 
the  1930s  and  1950s,  and  the  1960s  along  the  East  Coast)  are  not  unusual  events 
in  the  paleo-climate  record.  For  this  reason,  we  need  to  be  prepared  for  droughts, 
and  focus  our  attention  on  mitigation  and  planning  strategies  that  would  reduce 
drought impacts before droughts strike. 

The  National  Drought  Mitigation  Center  (NDMC)  was  formed  in  1995.  At  that 
time,  there  was  no  national  initiative  or  program  that  focused  on  drought  moni-
toring, mitigation, and preparedness and the Nation was just coming out of a period 
of  serious  drought  lasting  from  1988  to  1994.  I  have  been  involved  in  drought-re-
lated  research  and  outreach  since  1980,  and  the  formation  of  the  NDMC  developed 
out  of  a  national  conference  on  drought  that  I  organized  in  1994.  During  the  first 
year,  our  funding  came  from  both  NOAA  and  USDA.  Since  then,  the  NDMC’s  base 
operating budget is provided through USDA and supplemented by numerous grants 
from NOAA, NSF, NASA, USGS, BoR, and other USDA agencies. 

The  NDMC’s  program  is  directed  at  lessening  societal  vulnerability  to  drought 
through  a  risk-based  management  approach.  The  NDMC’s  activities  include  pro-
moting and conducting research and outreach activities on drought monitoring, miti-
gation, and preparedness technologies; improving coordination of drought-related ac-
tivities  and  actions  within  and  between  levels  of  government;  and  assisting  in  the 
development, dissemination, and implementation of appropriate mitigation and pre-
paredness  technologies  in  the  public  and  private  sectors.  Emphasis  is  placed  on  re-
search  and  outreach  projects  and  mitigation/management  strategies  and  programs 
that stress risk management measures rather than reactive, crisis management ac-
tions. 

After the NDMC formed, a severe drought struck the Southern Plains and South-
western  United  States  in  1995–96.  Beginning  in  1999,  the  Nation  has  experienced 
another  series  of  drought  events.  These  droughts  peaked  in  2000  and  2002,  when 
close  to  40  percent  of  the  Nation  was  considered  to  be  in  severe  drought  or  worse. 
At  the  end  of  July  2002,  all  50  states  were  experiencing  some  level  of  dryness  or 
drought,  according  to  the  U.S.  Drought  Monitor.  For  states  in  the  West  (Montana, 
Wyoming,  Nebraska,  New  Mexico,  and  Colorado),  the  drought  became  a  multiple-
year  event  that  continues  in  some  of  these  locations.  For  states  in  the  Southeast 
(Georgia and South Carolina, for example), an unprecedented five-year drought took 
place between 1998 and 2002. 

Even  during  2005,  when  the  percent  area  of  the  country  experiencing  serious 
drought  fell  below  that  of  previous  years,  an  extreme  drought  spread  over  parts  of 
Illinois,  Iowa,  Missouri,  Arkansas,  and  Texas.  For  some  locations,  the  summer  was 
one of the driest ever. At a few other locations, 2005 is on pace to be the driest year 
on  record,  surpassing  even  the  dryness  experienced  during  the  famous  drought 
years  of  the  1930s  and  1950s.  The  area  in  drought  in  2005  included  a  portion  of 
the  Nation’s  Corn  Belt.  Estimates  of  crop  losses  for  Illinois  originally  totaled  $1.3 
billion,  but  recent  estimates  have  improved  that  number  to  approximately  $0.7  bil-
lion,  mainly  in  the  northern  and  central  parts  of  the  state.  These  drought  losses 
could  have  been  much  worse  without  the  well-timed  moisture  remnants  moving 
across  the  area  as  a  result  of  several  of  the  hurricanes  that  struck  the  Gulf  Coast 
in 2005. The last big drought to hit the Corn Belt hard was in 1988, with estimated 
crop  production-related  losses  of  approximately  $15  billion.  We  narrowly  dodged  a 
huge bullet in 2005. 

Through these recent droughts, the NDMC has continued to work across the coun-
try  on  its  mission.  The  NDMC  maintains  its  involvement  in  drought  monitoring 
through the U.S. Drought Monitor map, which is a weekly assessment of the current 
drought  conditions.  Two  of  the  NDMC  staff,  Mark  Svoboda  and  Michael  Hayes, 
serve  as  authors  for  this  product,  along  with  partners  at  NOAA  and  USDA.  The 
NDMC also participates in the monthly North American Drought Monitor, which in-
cludes  collaboration  with  Canadian  and  Mexican  scientists.  Several  countries  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

29

regions  around  the  world  have  expressed  interest  in  adopting  the  Drought  Monitor 
format  to  assess  drought  conditions.  The  NDMC  has  been  involved  in  a  NATO 
project  with  the  Czech  Republic  to  investigate  drought  monitoring  opportunities  in 
Central  Europe.  In  November  2005,  the  NDMC,  NOAA,  and  USDA  will  be  partici-
pating  in  a  bilateral  workshop  with  the  Chinese  Meteorological  Agency  on  drought 
monitoring strategies for China. 

The  NDMC  is  continuing  to  conduct  research  in  the  broadly  defined  areas  of 
drought monitoring, mitigation, and planning. We continue to work with NOAA and 
the  Western  Governors’  Association  on  the  implementation  of  the  National  Inte-
grated  Drought  Information  System  (NIDIS).  The  NDMC  recently  launched  a  new 
web-based  product  directed  at  development  of  a  web-based  drought  impacts  tool  to 
help  NOAA,  USDA,  and  other  agencies  determine  the  impacts  associated  with 
drought in a timely manner. The NDMC has a proposal pending with NOAA to fur-
ther support this activity. 

In  terms  of  outreach,  education,  and  training,  the  NDMC  continues  to  maintain 
and  improve  its  website  (drought.unl.edu)  and  the  U.S.  Drought  Monitor  website. 
These  two  sites  resulted  in  more  than  12  million  hits  in  2005.  We  organized  and 
conducted  three  drought  workshops  during  2005  and  participated  in  many  other 
workshops  and  conferences  throughout  the  United  States  and  internationally.  The 
Center  continues  to  assist  other  states  and  local  governments  in  the  development 
or revision of drought plans. Thirty-eight states now have drought response or miti-
gation plans in place, largely through the efforts of the NDMC. 

In  summary,  the  NDMC  strongly  supports  more  research  and  development  to  in-
vestigate issues of climate variability, natural hazards, and drought. Our experience 
with drought is that, in the long run, by making a wise initial investment, the Na-
tion will save money by improving our capability for drought monitoring, mitigation, 
and response. Initial investments like these will reduce the adverse affects of future 
climate events on our Nation. 

EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE PRESIDENT, OFFICE OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY 
POLICY 

Washington, DC, December 13, 2005

Hon. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON,
Chairman, 
Senate Subcommittee on Science and Space, 
Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee, 
Washington, DC.
Dear Senator Hutchison:

This  letter  is  in  response  to  S.  517,  ‘‘the  Weather  Modification  Research  and  De-
velopment Policy Authorization Act of 2005,’’ reported out by the Senate Committee 
on  Commerce,  Science  and  Transportation  on  November  17,  2005  (Senate  Report 
No.  109–202).  While  the  Administration  recognizes  the  Committee’s  interest  in 
weather modification research and development, there is a host of issues—including 
liability,  foreign  policy,  and  national  security  concerns—that  arose  in  the  past  and 
should be adequately considered before the U.S. Government undertakes the coordi-
nated national research program this legislation would require. 

The  Administration  respectfully  requests  that  you  defer  further  consideration  of 
the  bill  pending  the  outcome  of  an  inter-agency  discussion  of  these  issues  that  the 
Office of Science and Technology Policy (OSTP) would coordinate—with the Depart-
ment  of  Justice  on  legal  issues,  with  the  Department  of  State  on  foreign  policy  im-
plications, with the Departments of Defense and State on national security implica-
tions, and with pertinent research agencies to consider the reasons the U.S. Govern-
ment  previously  halted  its  work  in  this  area.  At  the  conclusion  of  this  review,  the 
Administration  would  report  back  to  you  on  the  results  of  these  discussions  so  you 
are  fully  apprised  of  all  possible  issues  associated  with  authorizing  a  new  Federal 
program on this topic. 

Specifically,  the  Administration  believes  concerns  in  the  following  areas  must  be 

better understood:

• Local Political & Legal Ramifications

—Because  small  scale  weather  modification  (e.g.,  cloud  seeding)  may  promote 
rain  in  one  area  to  the  detriment  of  another,  weather  modification  could  result 
in  inter-state  (including  Indian  Tribes)  litigation  or  private  citizen  litigation 
against the modification programs.
—The  legal  and  liability  issues  pertaining  to  weather  modification,  and  the  po-
tential  adverse  consequences  on  life,  property,  and  water  resource  availability 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

30

resulting  from  weather  modification  activities,  must  be  considered  fully  before 
the  U.S.  Government  could  take  responsibility  for  this  new  research  program.

• International and Foreign Policy Implications

—Small and large scale (e.g., hurricane) weather modification efforts could ben-
efit  the  United  States  to  the  detriment  of  other  countries  (such  as  Canada  or 
Mexico).
—Given global weather patterns, whether one country ‘‘owns’’ its weather so as 
to  assert  intra-border  control  with  extra-border  consequences,  must  be  consid-
ered under present international conventions.
—The manner in which such a program could benefit or harm the present U.S. 
positions  on  foreign  policy  matters,  such  as  global  warming/climate  change, 
should also be considered.

• National Security Implications

—The  U.S.  Government’s  previous  weather  modification  programs  were  part  of 
our Cold War history; restarting them today could promote (possibly hostile) for-
eign responses.
—In 1978, the United States became a party to an international treaty banning 
the  use  of  weather  modification  for  hostile  purposes.  While  modification  for 
peaceful  purposes  is  allowed,  whether  well-intentioned  programs  could  be  con-
sidered ‘‘hostile’’ and perceived to violate this ban should be considered.

• Research Issues

—The  Department  of  Commerce’s  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Adminis-
tration’s  (NOAA)  primary  atmospheric  and  meteorological  research  focus  is  on 
improving  weather  forecasting,  which  has  proven  to  save  lives  and  property. 
NOAA  abandoned  weather  modification  activities  some  time  ago  in  favor  of 
other  research  areas  that  more  directly  relate  to  the  agency’s  core  mission  and 
responsibilities.
—Redirecting  funding  to  focus  on  weather  modification  can  shift  funds  away 
from other important programs such as research to improve weather forecasting 
capabilities for severe weather events and research to better understand climate 
variability and change.

In  addition  to  discussing  these  concerns  on  an  interagency  basis,  and  in  recogni-
tion  of  your  interest  in  this  area,  OSTP  would  be  willing  to  charter  a  study  to  ad-
dress  the  above  issues.  This  study  would  be  conducted  by  the  Science  and  Tech-
nology  Policy  Institute  (STPI),  a  federally-chartered  research  and  development  cen-
ter  that  provides  objective,  technical  advice  to  OSTP.  The  study  would  address  the 
history and current status of weather modification research. Such a study will help 
us  understand  the  technical  position  of  this  field  of  science,  the  significance  of  the 
issues discussed above, and the field’s historical context. 

The Administration requests that you not move forward with your legislative pro-
posal until a better understanding can be developed of the full range of possible im-
plications. 

Thank you for your consideration. 

Sincerely, 

JOHN H. MARBURGER, III, 

Director. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

DR. JOSEPH H. GOLDEN 

Weather Board 

Question  1.  What  is  this  Board’s  legal  and  line  of  authority  relationship  to  the 

Secretary of Commerce and the Administrator of NOAA? 

Answer.  There  is  no  legal  and  line  of  authority  relationship  of  the  Board  to  the 
Secretary of Commerce and NOAA. However, a Subcommittee would be established 
under OSTP and a board of private advisors will support the Subcommittee’s efforts. 
NOAA will be a Co-Chair of the Subcommittee with NSF.

Question 2. What is the legal and scientific basis for creating such a powerful enti-

ty? 

Answer.  This  entity  is  being  established  to  study  the  effectiveness  of  a  weather 
modification  program  and  would  not  establish  direct  authority  to  conduct  oper-
ational weather modification.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

31

Question 3. The establishment of this Board appears to place weather modification 
research  above  all  other  types  of  atmospheric  research  as  a  priority  for  funding 
within the Federal system. Why? 

Answer.  No,  I  do  not  believe  the  bill  places  weather  modification  research  above 
any  other  type  of  atmospheric  research  within  the  Federal  agencies.  Further,  one 
cannot divorce weather modification research from basic atmospheric research. One 
must not forget that a prerequisite for meaningful weather modification is that one 
must  first  understand  the  phenomenon  being  modified.  Thus,  weather  modification 
research  always  adds  to  the  body  of  knowledge  of  basic  weather  we  already  have 
now,  resulting  in  better  forecasts  and  warnings  of  most  weather  phenomena.  I 
strongly believe that now is the time to begin a sustained Federal effort in weather 
modification  research,  not  only  to  determine  optimum  conditions  and  appropriate 
technologies for winter snowpack and summer rainfall enhancement, but for studies 
of severe storm modification (including hurricanes and tornadoes) as well. I have no 
doubt that some of the most urgent weather modification research will directly ben-
efit NWS/NOAA goals as well in short-term weather forecasts and warnings.

Question  4.  Would  this  board  have  subpoena  powers  and  the  power  to  issue 

‘‘rules,’’ as is suggested by the bill? 

Answer. No, I don’t anticipate that the Board, in either bill, would have subpoena 
powers.  Nor  do  I  feel  that  it  should  issue  ‘‘rules,’’  as  other  groups  like  the  ASCE 
already  issue  best-practice  documents  for  weather  modification  operations.  The 
Board should organize and coordinate a national Federal program in weather modi-
fication research and technology development, and recommend needed funding to ac-
complish these tasks (through the expert Subcommittee).

Question 5. Is the purpose of the Board to essentially create an independent agen-
cy  dedicated  to  the  promotion  of  weather  modification  research  and  distribution  of 
grants? Please explain. 

Answer.  No,  again,  the  Board  and  its  Subcommittee  of  experts  should  develop  a 
coordinated national program of research through existing Federal agencies, includ-
ing especially NOAA, NSF, and NASA. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON TO

DR. JOSEPH H. GOLDEN 

Legal Issues of Weather Modification 

Has  anyone  considered  the  legal  issues  involved  in  weather  modification?  There 
is  only  a  certain  amount  of  moisture  in  the  atmosphere;  if  artificial  measures  are 
used  to  make  it  rain  in  a  particular  location  to  relieve  drought,  for  example,  that 
water is diverted from another location where it would have ultimately fallen. This 
raises similar issues as water rights controversies, where rivers have been diverted 
to accommodate certain interests at the expense of others. 

Question  1.  Has  the  scientific  community  considered  the  legal  implications  of 

weather modification? 

Answer.  Yes,  the  scientific  community  has  carefully  considered  the  legal  implica-
tions of weather modification for many years. One of my esteemed colleagues in the 
weather modification community (deceased) was Ray Jay Davis, a lawyer from Salt 
Lake  City.  My  colleague,  Dr.  Tom  DeFelice  will  include  more  details  and  some  of 
Mr. Davis’ writings on legal issues in his response to your question.

Question  1a.  Shouldn’t  Congress  be  concerned  that  any  government  supported 
Weather  Modification  Board  might  support  research  and  development  of  weather 
modifications without considering the legal implications? 

Answer. I believe that the Board will be composed of a broad cross-section of pub-
lic  and  private  individuals  who  will  act  responsibly,  with  additional  oversight  by 
OSTP.  Legal  implications  become  most  important  in  weather  modification  oper-
ations,  but  at  this  time,  no  operational  seeding  will  be  conducted  by  the  Federal 
Government  in  any  research  supported  by  the  bill.  The  Congress  passed  a  Public 
Law  in  l971  that  requires  all  operational  weather  modification  projects  in  the  U.S. 
to report details of their projects at least once a year to NOAA.

Question 2. Have you addressed the basic question of who owns the weather? 
Answer.  There  is  no  sole  ownership  of  the  weather,  therefore,  any  large-scale 
operational weather modification projects have always had to address both legal and 
environmental  issues.  For  example,  the  NOAA/Navy  joint  hurricane  modification 
Project  STORMFURY  had  to  produce  an  extensive  study  of  possible  environmental 
impacts  prior  to  its  commencement,  and  these  were  all  documented  in  an  EIS  Re-
port  subjected  to  peer  review.  Currently,  the  Weather  Modification  Association  cer-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

32

tifies  weather  modification  operators,  and  includes  ethical  and  legal  guidelines  in 
the process. 
Funding 

I  am  concerned  that  there  are  a  number  of  areas  within  weather  research  that 
are  inadequately  funded.  For  example,  drought  is  of  particular  concern  to  my  state 
right  now.  The  National  Drought  Mitigation  Center  (NDMC)  in  Nebraska  has  only 
been  in  existence  since  1995.  Previously,  no  national  initiative  or  program  existed 
to monitor drought trends. The work at the NDMC in monitoring drought, not only 
in  Nebraska,  but  nationwide,  will  help  us  mitigate  and  respond  to  its  effects  in  a 
much  more  effective  manner.  This  is  only  one  of  numerous  programs  addressing 
weather  monitoring,  mitigation,  and  response  that  is  years  behind  where  it  could 
be. 

Question 1. Should funding of new research on weather modification be a greater 

priority than research in the weather we already have now? 

Answer. No, I do not believe either version of the bill places weather modification 
research above any other type of atmospheric research within the Federal agencies. 
One cannot divorce weather modification research from basic atmospheric research. 
One must not forget that a prerequisite for meaningful weather modification is that 
one must first understand the phenomenon being modified. Thus, weather modifica-
tion  research  always  adds  to  the  body  of  knowledge  of  basic  weather  we  already 
have now, resulting in better forecasts and warnings of most weather phenomenon. 
I strongly believe that now is the time to begin a sustained Federal effort in weath-
er modification research, not only to determine optimum conditions and appropriate 
technologies for winter snowpack and summer rainfall enhancement, but for studies 
of severe storm modification (including hurricanes and tornadoes) as well. I have no 
doubt that some of the most urgent weather modification research will directly ben-
efit NWS/NOAA goals as well in short-term weather forecasts and warnings.

Question  2.  Shouldn’t  we  ensure  that  existing  research  is  adequately  funded  in 
order  to  protect  commercial  and  governmental  interests  before  making  a  commit-
ment to support private research? 

Answer.  Yes,  we  should  ensure  adequate  funding  for  Federal  weather  research. 

This bill will not make a commitment to direct private research in weather. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BILL NELSON TO

DR. JOSEPH H. GOLDEN 

Funding 

The  Hurricane  Research  Division  of  NOAA’s  Office  of  Atmospheric  Research  has 
been inadequately funded for many years. As a result, research staff vacancies have 
gone unfilled, years of data have gone unanalyzed, and the science of hurricane pre-
diction—especially with regard to intensity—is years behind where it could be. 

Question 1. Should funding of new research on weather modification be a greater 

priority than research in the weather we already have now? 

Answer. No, I believe that the two types of research are both needed and are not 
mutually  exclusive.  Weather  modification  research  will  certainly  add  to  the  body  of 
knowledge  of  the  weather  we  already  have  now.  This  research  will  be  supportive 
and complementary. Many of the most critical research issues for weather modifica-
tion  involve  technology  and  scientific  questions  that  directly  impact  the  short-term 
weather  forecast  and  warning  problems  faced  by  my  colleagues  in  the  National 
Weather Service and the U.S. Military.

Question  2.  Shouldn’t  we  ensure  that  government  hurricane  research  is  ade-
quately  funded  in  order  to  protect  lives  before  we  make  a  commitment  to  support 
private  research  in  weather  research  that  has  primarily  only  commercial  applica-
tions? 

Answer.  Yes,  we  should  ensure  adequate  funding  for  government  research.  I  am 
knowledgeable  about  the  need  for  hurricane  research.  This  bill  would  not  make  a 
commitment to support private research in weather. 

I  believe  that  the  premise  of  this  question  is  incorrect,  because  the  bulk  of  the 
research  and  funding  to  carry  it  forward  would  occur  in  the  Federal  weather  labs 
and the universities. The weather modification research would have applications ex-
tending  far  beyond  ‘‘commercial  applications.’’  The  outputs  of  this  research  would 
also have immediate payoffs to helping Federal agencies reach their GPRA goals in 
improved  observations,  modeling  and  improved  forecast/warning  performance  for 
NWS. For example, improved 3–D models for determining transport of seeding ma-
terials  into  cloud  systems  could  also  be  used  for  tracking  bioterrorism  releases  in 
populated areas and for improved forecasts of air quality. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

ty? 

33

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

DR. THOMAS P. DEFELICE 

Weather Board 

Question 1. What is this board’s legal and line of authority relationship to the Sec-

retary of Commerce and the Administrator of NOAA? 

Answer.  Recent  bill  mark  up  discussions  call  for  a  permanent  subcommittee 
(Weather  Modification)  within  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology,  who’s  chair 
would report directly to the President’s Science Advisor.

Question 2. What is the legal and scientific basis for creating such a powerful enti-

Answer.  There  are  multiple  reasons  to  take  everyday  basic  and  applied  science 
knowledge, combine it with latest technologies and apply them creating not only im-
proved science and technology, but also tools that better serve and support the peo-
ple.  There  is  no  funding  to  accomplish  said,  and  time  is  running  out.  This  sub-
committee  is  necessary  to  study  and  verify  the  effectiveness  and  reliability  of  the 
science of weather modification.

Question 3. The establishment of this board appears to place weather modification 
research  above  all  other  types  of  atmospheric  research  as  a  priority  for  funding 
within the Federal system. Why? 

Answer.  No,  the  establishment  of  this  board  does  not  place  weather  modification 
research above all other types of research, Research related to weather modification 
more  visibly  serves  societal  needs  (such  as  providing  more  water  for  reservoirs,  en-
ergy generation or more sunshine for mental wellbeing, energy storage, reducing the 
destructive  forces  associated  with  hurricanes,  or  drought  mitigation),  and  also  pro-
vides data for the research already underway.

Question  4.  Would  this  board  have  subpoena  powers  and  the  power  to  issue 

‘‘rules,’’ as is suggested by the bill? 

prised of Federal agencies.

Answer.  No,  the  Board  will  only  report  to  the  Subcommittee  which  will  be  com-

Question 5. Is the purpose of the Board to essentially create an independent agen-
cy  dedicated  to  the  promotion  of  weather  modification  research  and  distribution  of 
grants? Please explain. 

Answer.  No,  the  Board  will  report  suggestions  and  provide  answers  to  technical 

questions issued by the subcommittee. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON TO

DR. THOMAS P. DEFELICE 

Question 1. Has anyone considered the legal issues involved in weather modifica-
tion?  There  is  only  a  certain  amount  of  moisture  in  the  atmosphere;  if  artificial 
measures  are  used  to  make  it  rain  in  a  particular  location  to  relieve  drought,  for 
example,  that  water  is  diverted  from  another  location  where  it  would  have  ulti-
mately fallen. 

Answer.  Yes  there  is  a  certain  amount  of  moisture  in  the  atmosphere  and  most 
of it naturally stays there in some form or another. Very little atmospheric moisture 
falls  out  as  precip  (rain)  on  a  global  average  basis.  The  precipitation  efficiency  of 
a thunderstorm is only about 20 percent, meaning 80 percent of the moisture associ-
ated with it remains in the atmosphere. I can provide the reference. 

Cloud  seeding  does  not  divert  rain  from  falling  in  one  place  in  favor  of  another 
(or  in  other  words,  cloud  seeding  does  not  rob  Peter  of  rain  to  ‘water’  Paul,  it  pro-
vides a little more rain to Peter and more rain to Paul than he would have received 
naturally). Clouds have been observed to contain plenty of moisture, even during the 
early months of a drought-period. Clouds just don’t always possess a natural precipi-
tation  initiation  mechanism  (virga—precipitation  that  doesn’t  reach  the  ground—is 
not  an  example  of  a  viable  precipitation  process,  but  may  occur).  The  absence  of  a 
viable  precipitation  process  also  happens  frequently  in  the  areas  surrounding 
deserts (drought regions). 

Cloud seeding applied to such clouds, under the right atmospheric conditions, pro-
vides  the  trigger  to  initiate  a  viable  precipitation  process.  So  cloud  seeding  extends 
the  area  of  precipitation  beyond  what  nature  is  able  to  provide.  This  is  analogous 
to  receiving  a  flu  shot  to  make  our  immune  system  more  viable  during  flu  season. 
It is mostly not true that getting a flu shot gives us the flu. Not getting the flu shot 
generally means getting the flu.

This  raises  similar  issues  as  water  rights  controversies,  where  rivers  have  been 

diverted to accommodate certain interests at the expense of others. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

34

Question  2.  Has  the  scientific  community  considered  the  legal  implications  of 

weather modification? 

Answer. The legal implications of weather modification are well documented (e.g., 
Ray Jay Davis, lawyer (deceased); Academic Press book on Weather Modification by 
Arnett  Dennis  1981;  American  Society  Civil  Engineers  (ASCE),  Manual  of  Profes-
sional Practice for precipitation enhancement, 2nd Edition, and the ASCE standard 
practice  documents  on  hail  suppression,  precipitation  augmentation,  and  super-
cooled fog dispersal seeding operations). 

The scientists who regularly attend weather modification association meetings are 
familiar  with  these  implications,  and  efforts  have  been  underway  to  reach  others. 
The  Weather  Modification  Association  Public  Information  Committee  Chair  will  be 
happy to provide such documents to the Senator.

Question  3.  Shouldn’t  Congress  be  concerned  that  any  government  supported 
Weather  Modification  Board  might  support  research  and  development  of  weather 
modifications without considering the legal implications? 

Answer.  Legal  implications  mostly  apply  to  operations,  and  operational  seeding 
will  not  be  conducted  by  the  Federal  Government  under  Senator  Hutchison’s  bill. 
The board is comprised of people who have direct experience with weather modifica-
tion activities.

Question 4. Have you addressed the basic question of who owns the weather? 
Answer. This is currently left to the States. Under this bill any activity to modify 
the  weather  would  have  to  address  legal  and  environmental  issues  before  it  com-
menced since all would have a stake in the deliverable. 
Funding 

I  am  concerned  that  there  are  a  number  of  areas  within  weather  research  that 
are  inadequately  funded.  For  example,  drought  is  of  particular  concern  to  my  state 
right  now.  The  National  Drought  Mitigation  Center  (NDMC)  in  Nebraska  has  only 
been  in  existence  since  1995.  Previously,  no  national  initiative  or  program  existed 
to monitor drought trends. The work at the NDMC in monitoring drought, not only 
in  Nebraska,  but  nationwide,  will  help  us  mitigate  and  respond  to  its  effects  in  a 
much  more  effective  manner.  This  is  only  one  of  numerous  programs  addressing 
weather  monitoring,  mitigation,  and  response  that  is  years  behind  where  it  could 
be. 

Question 1. Should funding of new research on weather modification be a greater 

priority than research in the weather we already have now? 

Answer.  No,  but  funding  weather  modification  research  can  lead  to  additional 
technologies  that  more  visibly  serve  societal  needs,  such  as  providing  more  water 
for  reservoirs,  energy  generation  or  more  sunshine  for  mental  wellbeing,  energy 
storage, reducing the destructive forces associated with hurricanes, or drought miti-
gation. 

If science and technology expenditures can be explicitly directed toward resolving 
a  societal  issue,  it  will  make  it  easier  to  obtain  public  support,  as  society  will  see 
and appreciate that their taxes are being used to help resolve issues they face.

Question  2.  Shouldn’t  we  ensure  that  existing  research  is  adequately  funded  in 
order  to  protect  commercial  and  governmental  interests  before  making  a  commit-
ment to support private research? 

Answer.  Private  research  support  for  weather  modification  does  not  exist.  Thus 
research related to weather modification requires some research to understand what 
is  to  be  modified.  So,  funding  technology  development  and  their  application  also 
funds  the  existing  research.  The  direct  benefits  of  funding  weather  modification  re-
search  could  be  realized  in  the  Departments  of  Commerce,  Interior,  and  Homeland 
Security (tracking and removal of bioterrism agents). 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BILL NELSON TO

DR. THOMAS P. DEFELICE 

Funding 

The  Hurricane  Research  Division  of  NOAA’s  Office  of  Atmospheric  Research  has 
been inadequately funded for many years. As a result, research staff vacancies have 
gone unfilled, years of data have gone unanalyzed, and the science of hurricane pre-
diction—especially  with  regard  to  intensity—is  years  behind  where  it  could  be. 
Question  1.  Should  funding  of  new  research  on  weather  modification  be  a  greater 
priority than research in the weather we already have now? 

Answer.  No,  but  funding  weather  modification  research  can  lead  to  additional 
technologies  that  more  visibly  serve  societal  needs,  such  as  providing  more  water 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

35

for  reservoirs,  energy  generation  or  more  sunshine  for  mental  wellbeing,  energy 
storage, reducing the destructive forces associated with hurricanes, or drought miti-
gation. 

It  was  envisioned  that  the  NOAA  Hurricane  Research  Division  (HRD)  could  play 
a significant role in weather modification research, since HRD models represent the 
best  available  for  simulating  realistic  hurricanes.  The  unanalyzed  data  from  pre-
vious hurricane research are useful for conducting crude verification of select hurri-
cane model outputs.

Question  2.  Shouldn’t  we  ensure  that  government  hurricane  research  is  ade-
quately  funded  in  order  to  protect  lives  before  we  make  a  commitment  to  support 
private  research  in  weather  research  that  has  primarily  only  commercial  applica-
tions? 

Answer.  Yes,  government  hurricane  research  must  be  adequately  funded,  along 
with all weather system research. There is no known funding authorization for pri-
vate research. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED TO MICHAEL GARSTANG, PH.D. 

Priorities and Funding of Atmospheric Research 

Questions from Hon. E. Benjamin Nelson: 
1.  Should  funding  of  new  research  on  weather  modification  be  a  greater  priority 

than research in the weather we already have now? 

2. Shouldn’t we ensure that existing research is adequately funded in order to pro-
tect commercial and governmental interests before making a commitment to support 
private research? 

Questions from Hon. Bill Nelson:
1.  Should  funding  of  new  research  on  weather  modification  be  a  greater  priority 

than research in the weather we already have now? 

2.  Shouldn’t  we  ensure  that  government  hurricane  research  is  adequately  funded 
in  order  to  protect  lives  before  we  make  a  commitment  to  support  private  research 
in weather research that has primarily only commercial applications? 

Questions from Hon. Daniel K. Inouye:
1.  What  is  this  Board’s  legal  and  line  of  authority  relationship  to  the  Secretary 

of Commerce and the Administrator of NOAA? 

2. What is the legal and scientific basis for creating such a powerful entity? 
3. The establishment of this board appears to place weather modification research 
above  all  other  types  of  atmospheric  research  as  a  priority  for  funding  within  the 
Federal system. Why? 

4.  Would  this  Board  have  subpoena  powers  and  the  power  to  issue  ‘‘rules,’’  as  is 

NRC Report). 

suggested by the bill? 

5.  Is  the  purpose  of  the  Board  to  essentially  create  an  independent  agency  dedi-
cated to the promotion of weather modification research and distribution of grants? 
Please explain.

Answers to questions 3 and 5 (questions 1, 2, and 4 were beyond the Scope of the 

The  NRC  report  documents  the  decline  in  funding  for  research  in  weather  modi-
fication  over  the  past  3  decades.  Federal  funding  of  weather  modification  research 
declined by the 1990s to less than $0.5M/year. 

The NRC report points out the paradox between 

1.  funding  (largely  by  States)  of  unverified  weather  modification  methods  to  ad-
dress critical needs for water and reduction of damage (hail) but failure to fund the 
research needed to understand and improve these methodologies. 

2.  substantial  application  of  research  funds  directed  at  understanding  and  defin-
ing  the  implications  of  inadvertent  weather  modification  (global  warming)  but  fail-
ure to employ resources that would address advertent weather modification despite 
the  fact  that  many  of  the  basic  scientific  principles  underly  both  unintentional  and 
intentional weather modification. 

The NRC report emphasizes the fact that over the past 30 years enormous strides 
have  been  made  in  technology  enabling  processes  critical  to  all  weather  to  be  ob-
served,  recorded,  assimulated  and  modelled.  Explicit  attack  upon  critical  physical 
processes  such  as  the  formation  of  a  raindrop  or  a  hail  stone  is  now  possible.  Such 
a directed and sustained effort to remove obstacles to progress would pay dividends 
not only in weather modification but in many areas of the weather. 

For example, one of the greatest difficulties facing a weather forecaster is the pre-
diction  of  the  intensity  and  amount  of  the  expected  rain  and  hence  flooding  and 
other  damage.  Understanding  the  microphysics  leading  to  rain  can  be  significantly 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

36

enhanced  by  carrying  out  controlled  weather  modification  experiments.  This  under-
standing  of  precipitation  would  contribute  directly  to  furthering  our  ability  to  pre-
dict the intensifying or weakening of a hurricane. 

The NRC report recommends a very directed research effort which would address 
a series of obstacles in understanding critical atmospheric processes. Such an effort 
would benefit a broad spectrum of applications of weather science. 

The  NRC  report  explicitly  advises  against  the  application  of  Federal  research  re-
sources  to  rain  enhancement  or  hail  reduction  experiments  until  the  critical  ques-
tions blocking progress have been addressed. 

Finally, the NRC report points to the need and responsibility to address questions 
of  water  needs,  severe  storm  damage  ranging  from  hail  and  lightning  to  wind  and 
water  damage.  The  capability  now  exists  to  determine  whether  and  to  what  extent 
humans  are  capable  of  exercising  control  over  the  weather.  Unless  a  concerted  and 
sustained  effort  is  mounted  by  all  of  those  responsible  such  questions  will  remain 
unanswered. 
Legal Implications of Weather Modification 

fication? 

Questions from Hon. E. Benjamin Nelson:
1. Has the scientific community considered the legal implications of weather modi-

2.  Shouldn’t  Congress  be  concerned  that  any  government  supported  Weather 
Modification  Board  might  support  research  and  development  of  weather  modifica-
tions without considering the legal implications? 

3. Have you addressed the basic question of who owns the weather? 
Answer: 
The NRC report recognized the importance of weather modification research to so-
ciety  including  legal  implications.  The  NRC  Committee’s  terms  of  reference  were 
confined  to  addressing  the  current  and  future  state  of  weather  modification  re-
search. 

The NRC report does, however, point out that efforts in rainfall enhancement are 
directed  at  the  redistribution  and  efficient  use  of  existing  water  vapor  supplies  in 
the  atmosphere.  Intervention  could  produce  rain  where  needed  without  ‘‘robbing 
Peter to pay Paul’’. Research and operations which have shed light on this question 
suggest instead that ‘‘extra area’’ effects extend rather than limit the effects of rain-
fall enhancement.

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:20 Jun 30, 2006 Jkt 028211 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28211.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

